



































































Stormy Simon: Executive, Innovator, Social Media Wizard | Social Media Today




































Skip to main content



 





 





SIGN IN | REGISTER






 





WEBINARSSOCIAL NETWORKS



The Key to Social Media Success is Authenticity. Always.





5 Tips on How to Use Facebook Groups for Your Business



Twitter Releases New Data on Effectiveness of Efforts to Tackle Trolls and Abuse



5 Social Media Tools You Need to Try in 2017



Original Programming is Set to Make a Big Splash on Social Media






How to Use LinkedIn's New Trending Topics Module to Boost Your Presence



Snapchat Enables Recording Beyond 10-Seconds, Adds New Creative Options



Facebook's Removing the Ability to Edit Link Previews - Here Are Your Alternatives



LinkedIn Re-Adds Quick Profile Insights to Desktop News Feed


FacebookGoogle+LinkedInPinterestTwitterMARKETING



The Rise of Account Based Marketing through AI [Podcast]



7 Tips to Help Improve Your Marketing Copy



The Importance of Email Typography [Infographic]



26 Common SEO Mistakes That Are Killing Your Website [Infographic]



10 Types of ‘Explainer Videos’ You Should Use [Infographic]






10 Tips for Creating a Compelling Infographic [Infographic]



A Data-Driven Look at What Consumers Want From Brands on Social Media



Google Adds Natural Language Queries to Google Analytics



6 Stats to Improve Your Social Media Strategy


AdvertisingContent MarketingEcommerceInfluenceROITECHNOLOGY & DATA



Google Introduces New, Personalized Information Feed to Improve the Utility of Their App





6 Simple Ways to Improve the Security of Your Social Media Profiles



The Top U.S. Media Publishers on Social Media - June 2017



Divergent Realities: Augmented vs Virtual Reality [Infographic]



Why Marketers Should Embrace the Age of the Algorithms [Podcast]






Amazon, Whole Foods and the Transformation of Retail - The View from Social



How the iPhone Changed Visual Communication [Infographic]



14 Must-Have Windows Tools for Social Media Marketers [Infographic]



The Top U.S. Media Publishers on Social Media - May 2017


AnalyticsBig DataMarketing AutomationSecuritySocial ToolsTech and InnovationSOCIAL BUSINESS



Facebook Releases New Report on Video Consumption Behaviors on Facebook and Instagram





How Your Business Can Take Advantage of LinkedIn’s New Lead Gen Forms



LinkedIn Releases New Report on How Employee-Shared Content Can Drive Audience Action 



How to Make a Facebook Cover Video That Wows Visitors to Your Business Page



7 Tips to Help Improve Your Twitter Marketing Strategy






Facebook Announces That all Pages Can Now Create Linked Groups 



LinkedIn Adds New Data Tools to Help Advertisers Maximize their on-Platform Efforts



Content Marketing in a Nutshell – How to Use Content to Generate Real Business Results [Podcast]



4 Ways to Help Boost Your Instagram Presence


CommunityCustomer ServiceEmployee AdvocacyLeadershipSmall BusinessSocial OrganizationEVENTNEWSLETTERMY SMT 









#SMTLive Schedule






 







 







Explore more: 
marketing

branding

social networks

best practices

social media marketing
Stormy Simon: Executive, Innovator, Social Media Wizard








January 13, 2014 Amanda Green
The first thing people ask Stormy Simon is "Is that your real name?" Yes, it is. Her parents christened her Stormy after a character in one of her father's favorite books. That's not the only thing unique about Ms. Simon, however; in 2013, Stormy Simon was named the co-President of Overstock.com, adding a capstone to her career at Overstock that has included two Vice Presidency roles as well as Chief of Staff to the CEO. Her work at Overstock.com is notable for its multiple achievements, including adding entertainment media to Overstock.com's portfolio, restructuring its Customer Care and Personal Care departments, and launching herself as the public face of Overstock.com's commercials.Customer Care: Raising the Bar, Reaching the TopOne of Stormy Simon's most notable accomplishments at Overstock.com was the complete restructuring of its Customer Care program, an initiative that led to Overstock.com receiving its first ranking as one of the top five customer service departments in the United States in 2006. Overstock.com has remained on that list of top customer service departments ever since.Simon followed her Customer Care initiative with a similar overhaul of Overstock.com’s Partner Care program, ensuring that everyone who interacts with Overstock.com gets a personalized, top-level service experience. To quote Overstock.com Chairman of the Board Patrick M. Byrne: “If you want to make your company customer-centric, just take the most stubborn, unbending, hard-headed, customer-loving employee you have, and put her over customer service. The company gets customer-centric quicker than you ever thought possible.”Expanding Overstock's Mission: Books, Music, Videos and GamesIt was Ms. Simon's innovation that led to the development of Overstock.com's Book, Music, Video & Game department in the early 2000s. This allowed Overstock.com to compete more effectively with other online retailers, specifically Amazon. Simon was prescient enough to recognize consumers’ growing interest in purchasing media online, a decision which has reaped numerous benefits for both her customers and her company.Commercial Endeavors: Becoming the Face of Overstock.comAt the same time as Stormy Simon was bringing multimedia into Overstock.com’s fold, she also took on the job of writing, producing, and starring in Overstock.com's commercials. Stormy Simon essentially became the face and voice of Overstock.com, inviting customers to share in Overstock.com's deals by reminding them that "it's all about the O."Remember -- in the early 2000s, advertising was dominated by quirky corporate mascots, from the Quiznos "spongmonkeys" to the Geico gecko. By deciding to become the public face of Overstock.com, instead of turning over the marketing to a puppet or comic character, Stormy Simon let customers know that Overstock.com was all about person-to-person contact and one-on-one customer service.In the "All About Overstock with Stormy Simon" ad, for example, Ms. Simon explains how to use the Overstock.com site to find great products at the same time that she highlights the benefits that Overstock.com provides -- like its $2.95 shipping, regardless of order size -- and gives a shout-out to Overstock.com's award-winning customer service team. It's a brilliant ad, both for Stormy Simon's clear description of Overstock.com's services as well as for its simplicity; nobody will leave the ad wondering what Overstock.com does, or how to use the site to find deals.Social Media: Bringing a Personal Touch to the ProfessionalStormy Simon's Overstock.com commercials are only one example of her ability to add a touch of personality to her corporate mission. A quick peek at Stormy Simon's Twitter account, aka @Persnickidy, shows that she understands how to be both a corporate leader and a personable individual on social media. She combines tweets about daily life at Overstock.com with reports of her trip to a tattoo convention and short anecdotes about life on her farm, where she helps raise dogs, cats, goats, horses, and ducks.Stormy Simon is also willing to have a little fun, agreeing to let publications like MidlifeBachelor.com interview her for articles like "Stormy Simon: Woman of the Month." She understands the importance of putting a public face on her work and letting people understand that she is a real person with a distinct personality. This type of social sharing is what new media is all about; the more people know about you as a person, the more likely they are to trust your company. Overstock.com's customer value and appreciation remains high, in part because of Stormy Simon's decision to put herself out there and make Overstock.com personable.What's going to happen next for Stormy Simon and Overstock.com? We can't say for sure, but we look forward to seeing what Ms. Simon has planned, both for the future of Overstock.com and for her own work in social media.














Author Information




  
 Amanda Green
 
   

 




Sign up for the Social Media Today newsletter



You'll get a daily email with the latest news, lessons, and insights on:
Social Media
Marketing
Digital Strategy
and more

  Yes, I'd like to receive Marketing Dive's daily newsletter as well. Preview 
 







 




Related Items



  
Snapchat's Big Bet on Location Based Advertising




Five Ways to Take Advantage of Snapchat's New Map Feature


How to Use Video in All of Your Business [Infographic]

 
 





 





 




Join The Conversation

SIGN IN | REGISTER TO COMMENT 




Learn More

Get Our Newsletter
Download White Papers
View Latest Infographics
Read Marketing News
 




Webinars On Demand



  
 How To Build an Engagement-Driven Demand Gen Strategy in 2017 
 May 09, 2017 
 With all of the technologies available to marketers today, have we lost that personal touch? Join VP of Content Marketing for ON24, Mark Bornste... 

 Agile Marketing 101 
 April 05, 2017 
 In the ever-changing world of digital marketing, operational efficiency, quick turn-around times, testing and adapting to change are crucial to... 
 
 




Whitepapers



  
 How to Create Video at the Speed of Social: 6 Ways to Get Video Produced Faster 
 Video is expected to account for three-quarters of all mobile traffic by 2020.  But, creating powerful, effective video requires a significa... 

 Leveraging Psychology in Digital Marketing 
 Marketers are constantly seeking to engage with their buyers and drive actions that help buyers move rapidly through their customer lifecycl... 
 
 





































 



 Former Overstock.com President Stormy Simon to Deliver Keynote Speech at Women Grow Retreat for 
         










    










 













 











 



















Former Overstock.com President Stormy Simon to Deliver Keynote Speech at Women Grow Retreat for Cannabis Professionals
        																																												
              

          Pioneering E-Commerce Executive Will Offer First Public Remarks About Cannabis During Three-Day Retreat, Taking Place Oct. 7-9 in Oregon
        
















 News provided by
Women Grow  
Aug 11, 2016, 13:21 ET









 Share this article



























































DENVER, Aug. 11, 2016 /PRNewswire/ -- Women Grow, the cannabis industry's largest professional networking organization, today announced that Overstock.com's former President and acting Board Member, Stormy Simon, will share her first public remarks regarding her involvement in the cannabis industry during the organization's inaugural Wellness Weekend Retreat. Taking place October 7-9, 2016 at the Salishan Spa & Golf Resort (7760 North Highway 101, Gleneden Beach, Ore.), the retreat will bring together 300 cannabis industry leaders for three days of personal development and wellness activities on the Oregon coast.













                Former Overstock.com President Stormy Simon
              

 
 



Photo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20160811/397540 Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20160811/397539LOGO 
Women Grow CEO Leah Heise said, "Women Grow is honored to welcome Stormy Simon as the keynote speaker for our first Wellness Weekend Retreat. As an e-commerce pioneer and an influential advocate for female leadership at the executive level, Simon is an ideal ally for Women Grow and a symbol of increasing mainstream corporate engagement with the regulated marijuana industry."
Simon said, "The cannabis industry is an exciting space with incredible potential to revolutionize our lives. The Women Grow Wellness Weekend will be my first public address regarding my entrance into the cannabis space and the next chapter in my professional life. I look forward to supporting cannabis entrepreneurs, and am pleased to share my initial steps into the legal marijuana sector with the women who are leading a fair, equal, trillion-dollar industry from the outset." 
The Women Grow Wellness Weekend Retreat is a restorative three-day event that will allow cannabis industry leaders to connect with their peers and focus on personal wellness in an intimate, inspiring setting. Back-to-back breakout sessions and social events will allow attendees to explore relevant content in small groups and foster meaningful connections. Attendees can also choose from the resort's wide range of invigorating, restorative recreational activities. 
Tickets for the Women Grow Wellness Weekend Retreat start at $800 and are currently on sale. While Women Grow is female-focused, men who believe that diverse leadership is vital for the cannabis industry are also welcome to attend. To purchase tickets or learn more about the Wellness Weekend Retreat, visit womengrow.com/portland-wellness-weekend.
ABOUT WOMEN GROWWomen Grow is a national network that educates, empowers, and connects women leaders in the cannabis industry through monthly networking events in more than 35 cities in the U.S. and Canada, and at national conferences that shine a spotlight on individuals and companies building a diverse, fair cannabis industry. The for-profit organization welcomes male and female entrepreneurs and leaders at all stages of business development from within the many sectors of the legal cannabis industry. Visit WomenGrow.com to get involved, apply for membership, and learn more. Follow Women Grow on Facebook, and on Twitter and Instagram (@womengrow).
ABOUT STORMY SIMONStormy joined Overstock.com in 2001 during the formative years of e-commerce, when the company's revenue was less than $20M and employees numbered under 100.  In the beginning, Stormy developed PR in-house, the Books, Music & Movie store, ran the warehouse, and many other processes, positions and departments. She was promoted to VP of Branding in 2004 after writing and producing the iconic "Discover the Secret of the Big O" campaign which contributed to Overstock becoming a household name.  She became an SVP in 2007, and oversaw many departments, including Customer Care, Partner Care, Supply Chain, and all marketing divisions, culminating with her becoming president of the company in 2014 with approximately 1600 employees.  Stormy is an established e-commerce innovator, pioneer, as well as a proven business leader. In summer 2016, she stepped down as President of Overstock to explore the emerging American cannabis industry.
During her tenure, Overstock became an top 25 e-tailer by traffic and grew to nearly $2B in revenue. Under Stormy's leadership, Overstock was recognized by numerous associations; 4 consecutive years for Mobile Web Awards, and others for customer care including ranking in the top 4 AMEX/NRF Customer choice awards for the final 6 years the honor was given. Stormy was also personally recognized as a Customer Champion by Gartner 1to1 Media.  In 2014 the company was named to Forbes' list of "America's 100 Most Trustworthy Companies".
Stormy was named a Power Player by the NRF's 2016 The List of People Shaping Retail's Future, and awarded Top Innovator by Utah Women in Tech awards in 2015.  She's dedicated time to local non-profit boards, including the Columbus Community Center, which provides jobs to adults with mental disabilities, the YWCA advisory board, the Boys & Girls Club, and Jon Huntsman's Gubernatorial Committee of Economic Development. She also served on the board of Winder Dairy, and has been on the board of directors at Overstock since 2011.  She is known for her speeches on the importance of customer experience and empowerment of employees and women.  She is proud that during her presidency the female seats at the executive table have increased to 33%.
MEDIA CONTACT:Susannah GrossmanPR Director, Women Grow Email 832.771.8240
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/former-overstockcom-president-stormy-simon-to-deliver-keynote-speech-at-women-grow-retreat-for-cannabis-professionals-300312561.html
SOURCE  Women Grow  Related Links

http://www.womengrow.com




 










My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





 You just read:
Former Overstock.com President Stormy Simon to Deliver Keynote Speech at Women Grow Retreat for Cannabis Professionals


 News provided by
Women Grow  
Aug 11, 2016, 13:21 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In



















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 







Stormy Simon leads Overstock.com’s steady growth




































































Continue to your page in 15 seconds or skip this ad.






 







   


Jobs
Resource Guide
Advertise












 















The Retailer's Source for Content & Community
 









 
 






 





 

 















 





X






 













 Management 
 
September 1, 2015
 
  Cover Story:   A Calming Presence
Retailer of the Year Stormy Simon leads Overstock.com’s steady growth


















By 

Joe Keenan















Facebook
Facebook




Twitter
Twitter




LinkedIn
LinkedIn




Email
Email



0 Comments
Comments


 









 
 


An e-commerce lifer — granted, that’s less than 20 years — Stormy Simon can’t imagine doing anything else for a career. As president of Overstock.com, the Salt Lake City-based online retailer of home goods, furniture, women’s and men’s apparel, jewelry, electronics and a host of other products, Simon relishes the opportunity to come to work each day in such a dynamic, fast-paced industry. From temp worker to leading a company of 1,500 employees, it’s been quite a 14-year journey for Simon at Overstock.
When she started at Overstock in 2001, two years after the company was founded, Simon had zero experience in the retail industry. She was hired to work in the sales department, and was tasked with learning an industry in its infancy. Simon was in the right place. Overstock, along with Amazon.com and eBay, were the pioneers of e-commerce. A level trust of trust that’s been built with consumers over the years — along with a lot of hard work — have been key to Overstock’s success, says Simon.
“When Overstock started in 1999, we were developing a new behavior for consumers,” Simon recalls. “Traditionally, consumers bought everything by walking into a store. I think our success comes from timing. It was the right time to introduce shopping online, shopping home goods online. People hadn’t done it before [shopped online], so we really had to be dedicated to seeing it through.”
That success continues on today. In its most recent earnings call in August, Overstock reported its 14th consecutive profitable quarter, along with 17 percent revenue growth.
Loyalty Driving Growth 
The loyalty of Overstock’s customers is what Simon points to as essential for the retailer’s future growth. To help it retain customers for the long term, Overstock offers an aggressive loyalty program, Club O, that rewards members with cash back on their purchases, exclusive offers and free shipping (exclusive to Club O Gold members). And the program is easy to join. Club O Gold is $20 annually, while all that’s required of shoppers to become a member of Overstock’s recently launched Club O Silver program is for them to give their email address to the retailer. In addition, Club O membership is free to military, teachers, students and all first responders.
“It’s all about Club O; it’s just the richest rewards program online,” says Simon. “I’m a consumer at heart, so I can’t be passionate just because I’m an e-tailer. I love shopping and finding good deals, and Overstock really does give people that. And Club O pays me to shop, and I love it.”
With the success of Amazon Prime and the recent launch of Wal-Mart’s ShippingPass (unlimited free shipping for a $50 flat fee), customer retention through subscription loyalty programs appears to be a growing trend in the retail industry. Overstock has taken notice, and responded with improvements to its Club O program.
“Everyone is trying to figure out how to keep their customers more loyal,” says Simon. “You have to be dedicated to retention.”
  Amazon a Competitor? 
As a pure-play online retailer, it’s just assumed that Amazon.com would be considered competition for Overstock. And it is — just maybe not to the extent that you would expect it to be. Due to the diversity of Amazon’s business — e.g., its fulfillment business, web services, streaming entertainment options — Overstock doesn’t view it as a true competitor.
“Amazon isn’t our competitor,” Simon states. “It’s into so many categories, and it’s hard to compete in areas that we’re not currently in. How we do compete with Amazon is that we sell products online, and we have a curated product assortment from curated partners.”
Furthermore, Overstock is now competing with traditional brick-and-mortar retailers — e.g., Wal-Mart, Target, Macy’s, etc. — that have moved online as well. With the marketplace growing by the day, Overstock is looking to differentiate its business through high-quality products that provide value to its customers.
“Everybody is competing right now — you’re competing for that wallet share,” says Simon. “The problem is you can’t address every competitor. You can’t have a strategy for how to take on Target, how to take on Wal-Mart, how to take on Kohl’s. For us, we have to be true to our brand, our value proposition, and our customers and what they expect from us, while keeping our eyes wide open.”
In an effort to differentiate itself from the competition, Overstock is investing in technology and trying to give its customers the best shopping experience possible every time they engage the brand. Mobile is central to this mission. Overstock’s award-winning app and mobile site, for example, are used primarily as a research tool by its customers, who ultimately make their purchases on the desktop site. That trend has influenced Overstock to do things such as produce more high-quality content for its customers to consume.
“Content is king,” declares Simon, “and we’ve worked really hard towards providing more content about our products. Consumers can be anywhere at any time now with their phone, so we’re constantly evaluating ways to make a bigger impact in mobile. Consumers want to be able to research their purchases — that’s our content — but you also have to make it so it’s easy to buy, and that’s our app.”
Product Expansion in the Works
In addition to doing a better job of retaining its existing customers, Overstock wants to add new customers as well. Introducing new product categories is one way it’s going about doing that. However, Simon and her team are extremely cautious about adding the right products and working with the right manufacturers. Overstock doesn’t want to become the all-everything store. Value and quality is the foundation on which the company wishes to build on.
“We have these great partnerships that started 15 years ago, and I do think we can broaden our assortment,” says Simon. “The manufacturers that we’ve created partnerships with have been known to deliver amazing product. They take pride in what they’re making, and we know at the end of the day that there’s going to be a happy customer. We don’t want to do business with people that sell junk. There’s never a good end to that story when you’re an e-commerce company.”
To help with the increase in traffic that will come with a bigger product assortment, Overstock has invested time and resources into developing a proprietary commerce platform.
For Stormy Simon and Overstock.com, the past 14 years have been all about establishing themselves as leaders in the e-commerce arena. The next 15 years and beyond will be about growing the brand through a commitment to its customers, its products and vendor partners, and technology.





About Stormy Simon

What she enjoys most about working in the retail industry: I love shopping. And it's so cliché for a woman to say that, but it's the truth. I love the idea of treasure hunts, I love the people that I meet shopping. Retail as an industry is a few hundred years old, but online it's 20. A lot of the passion for me comes from that – being able to define an industry is what I love most. And still having it be a challenge, unknown and changing every day is really appealing to me.
What she would be doing if not working in the retail industry: I used to do radio and would probably have moved into a production-type business. But now I would love to work for the Chicago Bears. I'm a huge football enthusiast. I'm from Chicago and I always have these sports analogies because that's how my dad raised us. He was always comparing something to sports. I love the concept of team and everyone working for a common goal.
Leadership style: Casually intense. I'm very different at home than I at work. At home I'm just casual; at work I'm casually intense. You can live in this environment where you get to be yourself, but at the end of the day, you're really held accountable for the team you've drafted. The intense side comes from not letting the casual side fool you into thinking that we're not going to work hard or we're not going to achieve every day.
The best advice she's ever received: One that I refer to a lot is from my mom. She said to me when I was young, 'You do the right thing even when no one is looking.' Even if you don't have to do the right thing, you should because you're the one that has to live with it at the end of the day.
What she enjoys doing outside of work: I enjoy home because I've been traveling an awful lot. So home is great. I have two young men that I'm lucky enough to be their mom. And one of them has a daughter – and I don't say the “g” word – that's two and that has become my new obsession. And I love rock concerts. They're a good way to blow off steam. And then little short trips here and there, regardless of where here and there is. Yoga and watching sports. And then there are those days when you've been working so hard and doing so much that a good couple hours of reality TV where it doesn't really matter is exactly what you need.
Favorite book: Shel Silverstein's books
Favorite movie: The Untouchables
Favorite band: Aerosmith. I started listening to Aerosmith when I was maybe seven through my brothers, and it's just been a band that's really stayed relevant. And they're amazing to see live.
Favorite city: Chicago
Causes, organizations that she's involved in: Before I got so busy, I was on the board of the Girls & Boys Club here and the Columbus Community Center, which helped adults with disabilities get employment. Those are things that I think are important, and I need to get back to doing them. It's time.




















0 Comments





View Comments



 




People:Stormy Simon 










E


Joe Keenan
Author's page



Joe Keenan is the executive editor of Total Retail.                



 




Related Content












Can Multigenerations Coexist in the Workplace? Part 1





NRF Appoints Terry Lundgren as Chairman of the Board





Starbucks Names ‘Chief Partner Officer’ Amid Understaffing Allegations





Amidst Controversy, Signet Jewelers Names New CEO





Alfred Angelo’s Bankruptcy Leaves Customers Panicked





Tiffany & Co. Hires New CEO






 
  
 



Comments









 
 
















Subscribe




















Resources






















Subscribe








Subscribe to
Total Retail magazine



Subscribe






Find Resources










Categories



          Catalog Design (8)
        



          E-mail (7)
        



          Mobile Commerce (6)
        



          Branding (5)
        



          Promotional Strategy (5)
        



          SEO (5)
        



Show More Categories




          Affiliate Marketing (1)
        



          Analytics (4)
        



          Apps (2)
        



          Augmented Reality (1)
        



          B-to-B (2)
        



          Behavioral Retargeting (1)
        



          CRM (2)
        



          Content Management Systems (1)
        



          Content Marketing (3)
        



          Creative (3)
        



          Customer Acquisition (4)
        



          Customer Data (11)
        



          Customer Retention (13)
        



          Customer Service (12)
        



          Customer Service Reps (1)
        



          Data Security (2)
        



          Database Marketing (2)
        



          Digital Innovation (1)
        



          Direct Mail (19)
        



          E-Commerce (33)
        



          Fraud (3)
        



          In-Store Technology (3)
        



          Innovation Labs (1)
        



          International Strategy (4)
        



          Inventory Management (2)
        



          Landing Page Optimization (3)
        



          Leadership (1)
        



          Legal (1)
        



          Lifecycle Marketing (2)
        



          Loyalty Programs (4)
        



          Management (5)
        



          Marketing (24)
        



          Marketing Automation (1)
        



          Marketplaces (2)
        



          Merchandising (2)
        



          Mobile Design (2)
        



          Mobile Marketing (5)
        



          Omnichannel (11)
        



          Online Marketing (2)
        



          Online Taxes (2)
        



          Online Video (2)
        



          Order Fulfillment (2)
        



          POS Systems (1)
        



          Payment Options (1)
        



          Personal Development (1)
        



          Personalization (5)
        



          Personnel (3)
        



          Pricing (2)
        



          Product Packaging (1)
        



          Product Returns (1)
        



          Product Sourcing (1)
        



          Prospecting (1)
        



          Retail Stores (18)
        



          SEM (3)
        



          Shipping (4)
        



          Site Search (1)
        



          Social Commerce (1)
        



          Social Media Marketing (11)
        



          Software (2)
        



          Startups (1)
        



          Subscription Commerce (2)
        



          Systems Integration (1)
        



          Technology (20)
        



          Usability (2)
        



          User Experience (21)
        



          Warehouse Management (1)
        



          Web Analytics (2)
        



          Web Design (2)
        



          e-Commerce Platforms (2)
        


Types



          Best Practices (4)
        



          How-to Guides (4)
        



          Industry Sector Reports (57)
        



          Special Reports (18)
        



          Tips and Tools (2)
        



          Trends/Analysis (15)
        



          White Papers (43)
        



Have great content to share?




Upcoming Webinars





How Retailers Can Use the ‘Power of Place’
  This webinar will tackle how retailers can use customer data, including location intelligence, to help them make better decisions.
Learn MoreThe Secret to Optimizing Operations
  Attendees of this interactive webinar will learn why retailers struggle under the weight of increasing amounts of data.
Learn More













 








 
 
 

















Copyright © 2017 NAPCO Media.  All Rights Reserved.





 
 







 
x





























Recommended for you


 






Overstock.com president Stormy Simon to resign - MarketWatch
































































Latest News










Dow

21,516
-64.04
-0.30%






Nasdaq

6,389
+1.55
+0.02%






S&P 500

2,468
-4.68
-0.19%









11:00 A.M. ET


                                  Ironwood Pharmaceuticals stock price target raised to $12 from $8 at UBS
                                





 
10:59 A.M. ET


                                  Athenahealth stock price target raised to $175 from $157 at UBS
                                





 
10:59 A.M. ET


                                  Abbott Laboratories stock price target raised to $50 from $43 at UBS
                                





 
10:56 A.M. ET


Updated
      Investing according to your values can also make you money
                                





 
10:52 A.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s how wealthy Americans keep the best for themselves
                                





 
10:51 A.M. ET


Updated
      A 97-year-old ‘Dunkirk’ survivor laments current state of the world: ‘It never ends’
                                





 
10:50 A.M. ET


                                  Goldman Sachs' stock drops 0.5% after analyst downgrade
                                





 
10:49 A.M. ET


                                  Goldman Sachs stock price target cut to $230 from $255 at UBS
                                





 
10:48 A.M. ET


                                  Goldman Sachs downgraded to neutral from buy at UBS
                                





 
10:47 A.M. ET


Updated
      Exxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
                                





 
10:47 A.M. ET


Updated
      Chipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
                                





 
10:46 A.M. ET


Updated
      Alphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
                                





 
10:44 A.M. ET


Updated
      Why some older investors might invest in a long-term time horizon
                                





 
10:42 A.M. ET


Updated
      Good news if you love coffee
                                





 
10:40 A.M. ET


Updated
      The states where people spend the most on lotto tickets
                                





 
10:38 A.M. ET


Updated
      ‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
                                





 
10:37 A.M. ET


Updated
      Teaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make
                                





 
10:36 A.M. ET


Updated
      Dollar edges higher ahead of Fed meeting, but remains lower for July
                                





 
10:32 A.M. ET


Updated
      Why ‘Game of Thrones’ characters are smart to prefer status over money
                                





 
10:32 A.M. ET


Updated
      Nolan’s cinematic vision in ‘Dunkirk’ is Hollywood’s best defense against Netflix
                                





 








































Log In















 


Until London Markets Close

Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks














Home






Industries








         Overstock.com president Stormy Simon to resign
    








    By
        
        Claudia Assis

Published: July 15, 2016 4:09 p.m. ET

Share


















































 



 
















By


                                        ClaudiaAssis


Reporter








Overstock.com Inc. 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    OSTK, +1.54%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         said late Friday Stormy Simon will resign as the online retailer's president by July 25. Simon will remain a member of the company's board of directors until no later than Sept. 30, Overstock.com said in a statement. Simon's duties will be split between acting CEO Mitch Edwards and two other top executives. Patrick M. Byrne, Overstock's founder and CEO, is currently on medical leave. Shares of Overstock.com rose 1.1% in late trading after ending the regular session down 0.3%. 

















Quote References


OSTK

+0.25
+1.54%





Most Popular





Americans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30





‘Game of Thrones’: The four biggest takeaways from 'Stormborn’





O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family





A 97-year-old ‘Dunkirk’ survivor laments current state of the world: ‘It never ends’





Before NASA can send humans to Mars, it needs to solve these problems




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 


















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found




























Overstock.com Inc.
U.S.: Nasdaq: OSTK




$16.45

+0.25
(+1.54%)








Volume45632
Open$15.90
High$16.51
Low$15.90
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market Cap404.9M
























 






















Business Industry - Industry News - Industry Market Reports


























Bulletin






Investor Alert







London Markets Close in:



Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks




















  
      Industries
    




        Latest Industry News
    


Exxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
              
              Exxon Mobil is expected to report second-quarter earnings on July 28.               
              
            

13 min ago10:47 a.m. July 24, 2017








S&P 500





/conga/industries/main2.html
28078





        In Energy »




U.S. stocks under pressure as earnings roll in
              
              U.S. stock-market indexes are under pressure on Monday, as investors focus on a barrage of earnings this week.              
              
            

37 min ago10:23 a.m. July 24, 2017






Alabama Graphite Receives ADEM Permit for Final Infill Trenching Program for the Coosa Graphite Project Feasibility Study
              
              Alabama Graphite Receives ADEM Permit for Final Infill Trenching Program for the Coosa Graphite Project Feasibility Study              
              
            

42 min ago10:18 a.m. July 24, 2017








        In Banking »




U.S. stock market could get powerful tailwind from weaker dollar: Morgan Stanley
              
              Fretting about a weak dollar is sort of pointless when it comes to U.S. stocks. So says Morgan Stanley, which lays out the benefits, saying which               
              
            

9:07 a.m.  Today9:07 a.m. July 24, 2017






Charges dropped after ‘London Whale’ accused Jamie Dimon of making him a fall guy
              
              The case against two traders in the infamous “London Whale” case appears to have fallen apart after the Whale himself, considered a key witness, accused J.P. Morgan Chase & Co. Chief Executive Jamie Dimon of setting him up as a fall guy.              
              
            

8:46 a.m.  Today8:46 a.m. July 24, 2017






Gold tries to run up streak of gains to 7 sessions
              
              Gold tried for a seventh-straight advance with Monday’s narrow gain, drawing technical support near the closely watched $1,250 line even as the U.S. dollar stabilized from last week’s sharp loss.              
              
            

8:46 a.m.  Today8:46 a.m. July 24, 2017








/conga/modules/sixwide-divider.html
3095





        In Technology »




Pandora Media shares gain more than 4% premarket after upbeat analyst note
              
              Shares of internet radio company Pandora Media Inc.  were up 4.5% in premarket trade on Monday after an upbeat analyst note. SunTrust analyst Matthew Thornton sent a note to investors on Monday following a meeting with Pandora interim Chief Executive Naveed Chopra. Thornton's key takeaways from the meeting were that the subscription model that many analysts feel Pandora was late to isn't going away, but the company plans to drop investment to maintenance levels. Pandora also plans to increase its focus on monetizing radio, while reallocating subscription investment to sales hires and ad technology. The company also wants to increase focus on cost efficiencies. Thornton said Chopra told him that Pandora's hours growth could hinge on new content and that more details will be available in the coming quarters. Thornton maintains a buy rating on Pandora and a $10.50 12-month price target, which is about 11% above current trading levels. Pandora shares have declined more than 27% in the year to date, while the S&P 500 index  is up more than 10% during the same period.              
              
            

8:42 a.m.  Today8:42 a.m. July 24, 2017






Vice Media lays off 2% of staff as focus turns more toward video
              
              Vice Media confirmed last week that it has laid off 2% of its global staff. Variety first reported the news on Friday, saying the youth-focused media company would be laying off about 60 of its 3,000 staffers. The company, which has garnered major investments from and partnerships with Walt Disney Co. , has been in the midst of a global expansion while focusing on its growth in video. The cuts, while not limited to any of Vice's websites or business areas, did not include jobs in video. Vice says its video content has seen high demand. Other digital media companies have also recently realized the importance of video, most notably MTV, recently making a major shift to video content. Vice expects its overall headcount to expand as it opens offices in India, the Middle East and Latin America. Vice is tracking to be in more than 80 territories by the first quarter of 2018.              
              
            

8:24 a.m.  Today8:24 a.m. July 24, 2017






Applied Materials announces new CFO
              
              Applied Materials, Inc. [s:AMAT] on Monday announced Dan Durn would replace Bob Halliday as chief financial officer in August. Durn is currently CFO of NXP Semiconductors N.V. [s:NXPi] Halliday will take on a role in business development, and plans to retire in 2018. Applied is "working in the sweet spot of the industry," Durn said in a statement. The stock has gained 45% in the year to date, while the S&P 500 [s:SP50] is up 10.5%.              
              
            

7:10 a.m.  Today7:10 a.m. July 24, 2017








        In Cars »




Polaris beats profit and sales expectation as ORV and snowmobile growth helps boost results
              
              Polaris Industries Inc.  reported Thursday a second-quarter net profit that fell to $62.0 million, or 97 cents a share, from $71.2 million, or $1.09 a share, in the same period a year ago. The off-road vehicle maker said adjusted earnings per share came to $1.16, above the FactSet consensus of $1.08. Revenue rose to $1.36 billion from $1.13 billion, beating the FactSet consensus of $1.26 billion. Off-road and snowmobile sales rose to $845.5 million from $799.3 million, above the FactSet consensus of $761.7 million, while motorcycle sales fell 13% to $198 million but beat expectations of $192 million. The company raised its 2017 sales growth outlook to 12% to 14% from 10% to 13% and its adjusted EPS outlook to $4.35 to $4.50 from $4.25 to $4.50. "The powersports industry remained very competitive and headwinds persist, but we were encouraged by the return to growth in our Side-by-Side business and continued strength and aggressive share gains for Indian Motorcycles," said Chief Executive Scott Wine. On Wednesday, the company said it recalled 25,600 ATVs after reports of fuel leaks and fires. The stock, which wasn't active in premarket trade, has rallied 12.2% year to date, while the S&P 500  has gained 10.5%.              
              
            

7:46 a.m. July 20, 2017






Tesla stock initiated as neutral/high risk at Citi with price target 10% above current price
              
              Citigroup initiated coverage of electric car maker Tesla Inc.  Thursday, with a neutral/high risk rating and $357 stock price target. That's equal to about 10% upside from its current level. "We're positive on Tesla's position as a Car of the Future leader and view the upside case to still be significant, however, we prefer to wait for a better entry point either through: (a) A stronger balance sheet, which in our view would more favorably tilt the 12-month risk/reward equation, all-else-equal; or (b) convincing signs of a smooth Model 3 ramp with limited Model S cannibalization," analyst Itay Michaeli wrote in a note. The analyst said he is "fundamentally bullish" on Tesla, but that both bull and bear cases for the stock have merit. On the bull side, the company has had initial product success, brand appeal, speed of innovation and tech/software leadership," he wrote. The next 12 months rely on Tesla achieving Model 3 conversions and meeting margin goals, while continuing to cement its leadership in self-driving. Tesla shares were slightly lower premarket, but have gained 52% in 2017, while the S&P 500  has gained 10.5%.               
              
            

7:27 a.m. July 20, 2017






Polaris recalls tens of thousands of ATVs after reports of fire, fuel leaks
              
              Recreational vehicles company Polaris Industries Inc.  recalled about 25,600 all-terrain vehicles (ATVs) after reports of fuel leaks and fires. The recall involves 2014 Sportsman 570 model ATVs sold from April 2014 through May 2017 for $6,500 to $7,700 in several colors, which were made by Polaris in the U.S., according to the Consumer Product Safety Commission. The recall follows 30 reports of fuel leaks and four incidents involving a fire, although no injuries had been reported. "Consumers should immediately stop using the recalled ATVs and contact Polaris to schedule a free repair," the company said in a statement. "Polaris is contacting all known purchasers directly." The stock, which was up 1.2% in afternoon trade, has rallied 12.9% year to date, while the S&P 500  has gained 10.4%.              
              
            

2:48 p.m. July 19, 2017








/conga/modules/sixwide-divider.html
3095





        In Retail »




The states where people spend the most on lotto tickets
              
              There’s a tiny chance of winning the lottery, but that doesn’t stop Americans from buying tickets.               
              
            

20 min ago10:40 a.m. July 24, 2017






If you can’t resist the lure of bottom-fishing this market, at least follow these five rules
              
              Be it bitcoin, tech stocks, the S&P 500 or even gold, this is how you pick up a security cheaply.              
              
            

9:39 a.m.  Today9:39 a.m. July 24, 2017








        In Health Care »




Republican health bill still mystery before vote | Trump averaged 50% or higher approval in 17 states   
              
              GOP health-care bill still a mystery before vote; Trump averaged 50% or higher approval ratings in 17 states; Democrats pitch ‘better agenda’; and more.               
              
            

8:38 a.m.  Today8:38 a.m. July 24, 2017






Nektar Therapeutics surges 10% on $150 mln Eli Lilly deal
              
              Nektar Therapeutics  shares surged as much as 10% in premarket trade Monday after the company announced a $150 million deal with Eli Lilly & Co.  to co-develop its immunological therapy NKTR-358. The deal also includes up to $250 million in additional development and regulatory milestone payments. Eli Lilly expects an charge of about 9 cents per share to 2017 earnings, and expects to reduce its reported earnings per share guidance for 2017 by that amount. Nektar plans to complete phase 1 clinical development, after which Eli Lilly will shoulder 75% of the cost of phase 2 development, with Nektar responsible for the remaining 25%. Eli Lilly will pay for all costs of global commercialization. Nektar has the option to participate in late-stage development on an indication-by-indication basis, could receive royalties that increase depending on its phase 3 investment and product sales and will have the option to co-promote the drug in the U.S., the company said. NKTR-358 may address immune system imbalance for many kinds of autoimmune conditions, Nektar said, and the therapy had its first human dose in early-stage clinical development in March. Eli Lilly shares were not active in premarket trade on Monday. Nektar shares have surged 17.9% over the last three months, compared with a 1.5% rise in Eli Lilly shares and a 4.1% rise in the S&P 500 .               
              
            

8:15 a.m.  Today8:15 a.m. July 24, 2017






PetMed's stock surges after profit and sales rise above expectations
              
              Shares of PetMed Express Inc.  surged 2.4% in premarket trade Monday, after the pet pharmacy company reported fiscal first-quarter profit and sales that rose above expectations. Net profit for the quarter to June 30 increased to $9.3 million, or 45 cents a share, from $6.6 million, or 32 cents a share, in the same period a year ago. The FactSet consensus for earnings per share was 38 cents. Revenue grew 10% to $79.7 million, above the FactSet consensus of $77.3 million, as new order sales jumped 14% and with online sales increasing 12%. The stock traded at $41.50 ahead of the open, above the July 7 record close of $41.29. The stock has rocketed 76% over the past three months, while the S&P 500  has gained 4.1%.              
              
            

8:14 a.m.  Today8:14 a.m. July 24, 2017

















Most Popular





1.






Americans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30






2.






‘Game of Thrones’: The four biggest takeaways from 'Stormborn’






3.






O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family






4.





Key Words

A 97-year-old ‘Dunkirk’ survivor laments current state of the world: ‘It never ends’






5.





SectorWatch

Before NASA can send humans to Mars, it needs to solve these problems










Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 






Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:01 AM EDT
July 24, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:01aIronwood Pharmaceuticals stock price target raised to $12 from $8 at UBS
11:00aAthenahealth stock price target raised to $175 from $157 at UBS
10:59aAbbott Laboratories stock price target raised to $50 from $43 at UBS
10:56aInvesting according to your values can also make you money
10:53aHere’s how wealthy Americans keep the best for themselves
10:52aA 97-year-old ‘Dunkirk’ survivor laments current state of the world: ‘It never ends’
10:51aGoldman Sachs' stock drops 0.5% after analyst downgrade
10:49aGoldman Sachs stock price target cut to $230 from $255 at UBS
10:49aGoldman Sachs downgraded to neutral from buy at UBS
10:48aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
10:47aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
10:47aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
10:45aWhy some older investors might invest in a long-term time horizon
10:42aGood news if you love coffee
10:41aThe states where people spend the most on lotto tickets
10:39a‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
10:38aTeaching people how to invest is one of the best marketing moves an adviser can make
10:37aDollar edges higher ahead of Fed meeting, but remains lower for July
10:33aWhy ‘Game of Thrones’ characters are smart to prefer status over money
10:32aNolan’s cinematic vision in ‘Dunkirk’ is Hollywood’s best defense against Netflix
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,515.95

-64.12
-0.30%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,389.33

+1.58
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,467.88

-4.66
-0.19%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































 



Stormy Simon to Resign as Overstock President | Home Furnishings News



















 



Search

 
  
 
eLetter Subscription | Subscribe Now | Digital Edition | Photo Gallery
 



 



 






 

 







Stormy Simon to Resign as Overstock President 
Lauded by Overstock founder as “a key contributor” to the retailer’s growthJuly 18, 2016, David Gill
 













 
Stormy SimonSALT LAKE CITY-Stormy Simon, president of Overstock.com, will resign her post no later than July 25 after an earlier announced leave of absence.
Simon is leaving to pursue other interests, according to an Overstock statement. She will remain on the online retailer’s board of directors until no later than Sept. 30.
She began a leave of absence from Overstock on June 6, for undisclosed reasons, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Her responsibilities were divided among Acting CEO Mitch Edwards, Chief Revenue Officer Saum Noursalehi and Senior Vice President Brian Popelka—who will continue to exercise these roles as Simon prepares to leave the company, according to the company statement.








This is the second major change at the top of Overstock’s executive ranks this year. In April, Patrick Byrne, who founded Overstock in 1999 and who had been its CEO, took a medical leave of absence. Byrne has been battling hepatitis C, which he contracted in 1984 in China. In June, he returned to an active role on the board, although Edwards has continued as interim CEO.
Simon “has been a key contributor to Overstock’s evolution and growth from the early years, serving in a broad spectrum of roles and providing valuable leadership as president since 2014, and as a member of our board since 2011,” Byrne said.
Simon joined Overstock in 2001. “She has been a valuable member of the management team,” said Tom Forte, analyst with Maxim Group who covers Overstock. “She has been there a long time and filled a lot of roles. Today, Overstock is one of the largest e-commerce companies in the U.S.”
Over the past year, however, Overstock’s revenue growth has slowed, Forte noted. In addition, Wayfair has been taking market share from Overstock and other online retailers, particularly in home furnishings. “I could see this as a contributing factor to Stormy’s departure,” Forte said.
“While I will miss seeing my friends at Overstock on a daily basis, I am excited to focus my efforts on helping lead a new generation of entrepreneurs in developing a new sector of emerging markets,” Simon said.
 



 



 
David Gill | Senior Editor dgill@hfnmag.com
David Gill covers home textiles, small electrics housewares, personal-care products, cleaning products, mattresses, consumer electronics and major appliances. He also reports on retailers and writes about the business and financial side of both vendors and retailers. He has more than 30 years of experience in business journalism, and has worked for other publications and websites that cover consumer products from both the manufacturer and retailer sides. His outside interests include sports (he is a big fan of the New York teams and of British soccer), cooking, movies and theater. He occasionally enjoys a good cigar as well.
 

Other Articles By Author

Loftex, Applied DNA Sciences Partner on Towel Line
Welspun Pitches Wellness at Market
Capel Marks 100th Anniversary with Catalog
Design Source to Present Heirloomed Bedding 
Downlite Partners with brrr° on Basic Bedding Collection
 

Related Articles

Bed Bath & Beyond Acquires Chef Central
Macy’s to Eliminate 10,000 Jobs in Restructure, Store Closings
J.C. Penney Sells Headquarters for $353 Million
Stand Out, Speed Up Among Cited Business Goals for 2017
Sears Gains Letter-of-Credit Facility from CEO’s Company
 

Industry Insights




 



 



 



 



 

Sponsored Links

HFN's "Total Home: The Millennial Consumer Speaks"
HFN's "40 Under 40"
HFN's "Top 50 Retailers in Home Furnishings"
HFN's "The Housewares Consumer Speaks"
 



 

Videos


HFN Launches Interactive Idea Book

   More Videos

 
Subscribe to HFN Omnichannel
Receive the news you need to know about the trends in the industry delivered right to your inbox.





 



 

Current Issue




HFN's DIGITAL EDITION
July 2017
COVER STORY: Bloomie's Home MakeoverThe luxury department store retailer unifies its home floors at its flagship store on 59th Street in New York City and modernizes the shopping experience.
ALSO IN THIS ISSUE:

The American Makers - Retailers grapple with the rewards and challenges of selling American-made home furnishings.
Category Trends: Tabletop - The newest cocktail and dining trends influence barware and serveware design.

 
 Subscribe to Digital Edition


 

TWITTER: HFNmag

Tweets by @HFNmag


 
 

































The Stalwart: The Overstock Story Thickens













The Stalwart











« GoogleNet? |
	Main
	| The Last Word on Peak Oil »








The Overstock Story Thickens


Recently, we brought you The Case Against Overstock.com, summarizing the argument against the company made by blogger/hedge fund manager Jeff Matthews.  In a series of posts, Mr. Matthews has spelled out a convincing case that something "isn't right" with the company.  Too many questions unanswered, and the appearance, sometimes of outright fraud.
Now, we generally know it to be true that when a company focuses much of it's efforts on short-bashing they're probably wasting their time or, more likely, masking up deeper problems.  After all, the best way to hurt the shorts is in their pocketbook via good performance.
Via highbeam I found a bizarre transcript of an interview between Ron Insana and Patrick Byrne (Overstock.com's CEO) in which he lashes out at a conspiracy of naked-short-seller:INSANA:  First of all, give us the evidence that you have that a naked short-selling scheme is behind the decline in your stock price? 
BYRNE:  We have affidavits from people who participated. 
INSANA:  All right.  Can you be more specific? 
BYRNE:  No, I could, I`m not going to.  We have affidavits from people who participated. 
INSANA:  And what did they say was done exactly? 

BYRNE: They say that the research was supplied to Rocker before it was
published to the other clients, that Rocker had a hand in editing it,
making changes, making demands, that certain grades be lowered and then
ultimately, that Camelback (ph). 
INSANA:  Which is in now Gradient, right? 

BYRNE: Gradient -- I`m sorry, that Gradient actually hold the research
so he could build his position. It continues, I mean, the same people,
say Herb Greenberg at thestreet.com, was -- is certainly linked to
this.  
 
INSANA:
Linked in what way? I mean, you are making now allegations about
journalists helping others to front-run or trade illegally in the
shares of your company stock. 
BYRNE:  That`s correct, that`s what I am doing. 
INSANA:  All right.  So what evidence do you have that a journalist. 

BYRNE: I`ve got affidavits from people who were involved and can tell
the whole story and that I look forward to the day that those are
public. 
INSANA:
All right. Now, let me ask you about the SEC investigation which you
disclosed on your conference call this morning. Is this SEC
investigation, which you said was begun in February and is informal, an
investigation of the short sellers or an investigation of your company
and its financials? 
 BYRNE: Well, first of all, I think
I`m not supposed to officially know. I was tipped off anonymously from
folks within Wall Street that the SEC had gone on a fishing trip. I`ve
been highly. 
INSANA:  So you`re getting inside information, too?



Jeff Matthews, in his most recent entry reprints some of the recent conference call (which I haven't been able to verify myself, as it is not on highbeam yet) under the title "I am not a cokehead, and other truths from Patrick Byrne, CEO"I believe there’s been a plan since we were in our teens to destroy our stock, drive it down to $6 to $10...These
are the folks I’m going to talk about….Leon Black I’ve put in there
just because he’s a well-known financier hedge fund guy. Got nothing to
say about him. Sort of putting him in as an example of a -- just
somebody in a hedge fund...Jim Caruthers is an interesting
fellow. He’s up at Eastborne Capital, north of San Francisco. Eastborne
has an “E” at the end. It’s funny because there’s a fellow holding
himself out in a nearby location by the name of Jim Karruthers, with a
slightly different spelling, holding himself out as a private
investigator from Eastborn Investigations, no “E” at the end. I know
that couldn’t be this Jim Caruthers, because that would be a felony for
a person to hold himself out as a PI when he’s not. And that PI has a
very interesting relationship with a certain lawyer in Detroit who has
some very odd practices that maybe we’ll have time to get back to...Kevin
Ingram was a prominent fellow in the late 1990’s in Wall Street. He
left Wall Street, started a dot com. I think it was crashing. He got
caught attempting to sell Stinger missiles or obtain Stinger missiles
for some Pakistani ISI agent, who turned out to be undercover feds. In
fact, he agreed to work on obtaining a nuclear trigger for them. So he
went to the pen for a few years. He’s out now and he’s basically a
gopher for some of these folks...there's more:As
this went on I started realizing that there was actually some more
orchestration here being provided, by what I’m calling here is the Sith
Lord…He’s one of the master criminals from the 1980s, and he’s back in
business. But I’m not going to. I’ll just call him the master mind
today...So, in the words of Wayne and Garth, “Squeeze me?”By
the way, Carol Remond has something stuck in her craw about the fact,
most people I think understood that when I said “those I took baths
with” to mean like my cousins and brothers, whatever, girlfriends.
She’s calling around and saying that there’s a, Byrne has a gay
bathhouse cabal and that’s where this has been organized. Something
about the whole bath reference has steamed Carol. My theory is it’s
because she’s French…I put information down there that I was
gay. And…I put information down that I was a coke head. Now my
apologies to my gay friends, both within and without, outside the
company, I don’t mean to equate the two. I don’t care. I’m a
libertarian and I don’t care at all. In fact I don’t give a hoot if
anyone thinks I’m gay, but I thought that by keeping, by putting that
information down on one channel and putting the coke head information
down the other channel, I would then know if it leaked…On the
coke head thing, and by the way, I’ve never, with one exception, I’ve
never even seen cocaine in my life so in case you’re wondering, no, I’m
not a coke head...Read the whole thing here.
If this is really what was said on the conference call, and I'll be checking back to confirm this, then the CEO of Overstock appears to have gone off the deep end, and I shudder to think of the shareholders entrusting their money to him.
But what to make of Jeff Matthews and his one-man battle against Byrne and overstock.  In the views of this blog it is overdone.  In this entry he accuses Byrne of hiring a former exotic dancer as an executive vice president, by virtue of the effect that the executive, Stormy Simon, shares a name with an exotic dancer made in a Utah court.    The evidence is tenuous, and when combined with calling the CEO names, it seems that Mr. Matthews may be crossing the line, and using his blog as a way of promoting the short case (a bet which he has made) to his own profit.  Just like Byrne should let the company's operations do the talking, perhaps Mr. Matthews should let this die and make his profits, if and when shares of Overstock crater.






August 15, 2005 in Misc.  | Permalink








Comments







Why doesn't anyone check into Stormy Simon's past. She is a high school druggie dropout with no real business experience. The only and I mean the only reason she moved up in the Overstock organization is she sleeps with the boss. Yes, she is Mr. Bryne's sex toy at his beckon and call. That is why she is a Sr. Vice President. There is a reason she has had many positions at Overstock, and it is because she is not good at any of them. Others here at Overstock write memos and correspondence for her, and these "ideas" that she supposedly comes up with (like the Big-O) advertisements, they were not her ideas. She stole them, in fact, she can't even spell half the supposed words that are in her correspondence. She is a druggie who boasts about sharing drugs with her children, and basically has nothing good to say about her family. So why doesn't someone really look into her past before they try to make her look like some role model. In fact how do we not know she wasn't an accomplice to the crime, dating a man she knew was married, and then waiting 4 years to look like a hero. Ms. Simon is a deceptive phony, just looking to get into the spotlight at anyone's expense.


		Posted by:
		overstock anonymous |
		March 10, 2007 at 06:23 PM







Is Stormy from Texas?  Did she go to RL Turner highschool?  Would she be about 43?  If so I remember her.


		Posted by:
		jenn |
		May 24, 2007 at 10:33 PM







I worked for Overstock.com for almost 2 years and dealt directly with Stormy Simon for most of that time. She has held numerous titles with the company. The most interesting thing about her tenure with the company is her meteoric rise to power. Stormy was hired as a temp to telemarket for the B2B sales division. Essentially she was cold calling local businesses out of the yellow pages. In less than a year she managed to go from a temp employee from a staffing service to senior management. It was widely known in the company that Stormy had a special relationship with Patrick. However given her power and status in the company it is not in anybodys best interest to object or talke about it. I had numerous conversations with Stormy and other executives regarding Pot use and other recreational activities. There is a very good reason that Overstock.com does not drug test its employees at the corporate office. Stormy has a son who she got a job working at the warehouse. He failed a random UA and instead of being terminated he was offered a second chance to retake the UA in a month. The cocky kid then proceeded to brag that he was not too worried about passing his test as Stormy and Patrick would never let him be fired for drugs as he has smoked pot with Patrick on numerous occasions. Needless to say this caused quite an HR issue with the warehouse staff and Stormy's son was quietly dismissed. Upper management of Overstock.com has a name for some of the more bizzare directives and ideas put forth by Patrick Byrne. They are referred to as Patrick's Thai Stick Moments. I have witnessed Patrick Byrne stoned on several occassions as well as Stormy and other former executives. The company was effectionately known as smokemorepot.com by employess and others in the know. There is a serious lack of qualified management at this company. Anybody who is capable that is hired is quickly put into place by Stormy and most wont stick around long enough to to try and be effective at their jobs. It is well known at this point that should you cross Stormy or any of her minions, that you will find yourself on the unemployment line. So at the end of all this I guess my point is Stormy, Patrick and other management at Overstock are drug users to some degree or another. The biggest problem with this company is putting someone like stormy in a position where she has mostly unlimited power over the staff and little if any qualifications for the position other than being a good little girl for the big boss.


		Posted by:
		Mike Ockslarge |
		February 06, 2008 at 12:15 PM







I know Stormy she grew up in small town Tooele Utah and I have done cocaine with her on several occasions and you are right she does not have the qualifications to be in the position she is in. she did infact drop out of high school. 


		Posted by:
		Joe Dones |
		October 02, 2008 at 12:49 PM







She has slept with me for coke twice in 1992


		Posted by:
		jason huggins |
		May 22, 2010 at 09:43 PM







I don't have any opinion about what Sue Lowden said there, but I get the impression she has this stupid imperial air about her when answering questions and dealing with people. I get the impression she's used to snapping her fingers, pointing and casino workers just leap into action
Our  store offers you all kinds of favourite products likehttp://www.obsneakers.com/world_cup_2010_products/adidas_world_cup_2010 "> Adidas World Cup 2010 Shoes


		Posted by:
		Retro Jordans |
		August 21, 2010 at 02:55 AM







all of a sudden I've got the munchies....


		Posted by:
		navy48 |
		August 29, 2010 at 01:37 PM







you guys are all jealous idiots. Stormy Simon is a beautiful, successful, amazing business woman who took her rough life and disadvantages and turned around to make a name for herself. She dropped out of high school, so what? There are PLENTY of successful people who barely even passed the seventh grade, grew up in third world countries or have been in rehab. Do not judge her on her past, or assume that she is only at the top because she slept with someone. Get a life. Did you see her in bed with someone? Doubt it. GO back to high school if you believe rumors and start gossip. Do your thing Stormy Simon! Ignore the haters!
Jason Huggins, uh, she slept with you for coke huh? Why should anyone believe u? Cokeheads are liars.  
christina.jones57@yahoo.com


		Posted by:
		jaymee |
		September 12, 2010 at 02:34 AM







well i just saw her commercial and was wondering if she may have been related to carly simon. my mistake.


		Posted by:
		kristen |
		September 25, 2010 at 12:03 PM







Damn potheads are ruining the internet!
I'd much rather buy from an e-commerce site that employs alcoholics, power trippers and sex addicts who aren't qualified to have a few certain letters and maybe a period or apostrophe before their name!
Hell with it, I say that anyone who's risen to president or vice president of anything has either slept with everyone in corporate, snorted coke off at least 100 hookers tits, made everyones kids smoke pot, or slaughtered 1000 puppies in order to get the job...


		Posted by:
		Jigdo |
		October 22, 2010 at 08:05 AM







some of you in here talking about "OH MY GOD, she does pot, she's a druggie!" are a JKOE!  If you want to call someone a druggie for smoking pot then you are a hypocrite because you do drugs too (aspirin,tylenol,alcohol,tobacco) and did you know pot has NEVER,(yes, that's right, NEVER) caused anyones death as long as humans have been on this earth. Tylenol kills WAYYYY more people than that a year. So, you  wanna think again who you are calling a druggie? so next time you take a tylenol, remember you are drug addict. right?!


		Posted by:
		BM |
		October 22, 2010 at 12:23 PM







im kinda thinkin you ppl are jealous of stormie cause she DID move up.  so she used her yummie to do it, at least she did it.


		Posted by:
		bubba |
		October 23, 2010 at 03:29 PM







We have often repeated that the truth, because the error was also repeated in the propaganda, and not individual people but a large number of people publicity.Are you felt that it is right? I do not really think that, but can keep personal opinions!


		Posted by:
		coach outlet |
		November 03, 2010 at 05:14 AM







I started by examining if there was a difference in using DVB signals from the EWU (US, NYSE traded FTSE 100 ETF) to trade the FTSE 100 cash index. Naturally as the FTSE is closed in theafd US evening, I selected to make trades at the close of the next day. Previously I was assuming a trade would be entered at the close of the same day. 


		Posted by:
		True Religion Outlet |
		May 11, 2011 at 10:04 PM







Stormy Simon was not a stripper it was Made up by Jeff Mathews to attract people to his website the name of the blog if called Jeff Mathews is not making this up. Any person with a brain would be able to tell he is full of it. and weather or not she did coke when she was younger dosnt matter because she doesnt now and Jason Huggins I know her and i Know your full of S**T


		Posted by:
		B |
		May 18, 2011 at 05:04 PM











	The comments to this entry are closed.







What is This?


The Stalwart is a blog written by Joseph Weisenthal, covering such topics as stocks, business, economics, politics, technology, gambling, chess, poker, economics, current events, music, math, Chinese food, science, randomness, kurtosis, sports, evolutionary fitness, and anything else of the author's choosing. The words contained herein are the author's own, not affiliated with any other firm or employer.





About







Stats









Advertisements













Subscribe







Archives


May 2009
January 2009
December 2008
October 2008
September 2008
August 2008
July 2008
June 2008
May 2008
April 2008

More...



Categories


Agriculture
Apparel
Asia
Auto
Cattle
Chess
Chinese Food
Commodities
Communications
Currency
Deals
E-Commerce
Economy
Education
Energy
Europe
Evolutionary Fitness
Finance
Food and Drink
Gambling
General Business
Healthcare
Internet
Manufacturing
Media
Misc.
Pharmaceutical
Politics
Real Estate
Retail
Semiconductors
Sport
Steel
Tech
Transportation
Uncertainty

See More


























































A Fake Onion Story About Overstock.com Just Became A Reality | HuffPost
































































Tap here to turn on desktop notifications to get the news sent straight to you.


























EDITION
US











Arabi


Australia


Brasil


Canada


Deutschland


España


France


Greece


India




Italia


Japan


Korea


Maghreb


México


Québec


South Africa


United Kingdom


United States











Close


















TECH



01/21/2015 11:52 am ET
|

Updated
Jan 21, 2015



A Fake Onion Story About Overstock.com Just Became A Reality






By Alexis Kleinman










220





























On Nov. 5, 2013, satirical news site The Onion posted an article claiming that online retailer Overstock was going to create a streaming service for original video content. On Jan. 20, 2015, Overstock announced that it was planning to create a streaming service for original video content. For real. 
Overstock, a Utah-based online retailer that sells more than 1 million different products, is planning to start the streaming service this year with around 30,000 videos to choose from, CEO Patrick Byrne announced Tuesday at the National Association of Television Program Executives conference. You'll also be able to rent and purchase content.
"It's kind of ironic," Overstock President Stormy Simon told The Huffington Post on Wednesday. Simon said someone approached her after Tuesday's press conference to remind her of the 2013 article. She hadn't remembered the story, but the president of The Onion texted her after Tuesday's announcement. "It's hysterical," she said. "Reading it today, I thought, 'This looks like a press release!'"
Overstock's new service will be part of Overstock's membership program, Club O. For $19.95 per year, a Club O membership gets you extra discounts, free shipping, special deals at restaurants and more. Membership is free for students, first responders and military personnel. 
“We think this makes perfect sense for us to get into this business,” Byrne said. He added that the goal is to position Overstock as a competitor to Amazon. Club O is Overstock's version of Amazon's Prime membership, which costs $99 per year and gets users free two-day shipping, access to free streaming movies, TV shows and original content, free streaming music, access to the Kindle lending library and more. 
The 2013 Onion story, called "Overstock.com Announces Plans To Develop Original Programming, quoted Overstock's fake "vice president of original programming," Daniel Schulte, as saying "We’re incredibly excited to finally enter the arena of producing high-quality original entertainment, and we look forward to creating some great new comedy, drama, and children’s series that will make Overstock.com a true player in the original programming game.” Pretty on-point. 
The Onion did not immediately respond to a request for comment.
(h/t Adweek)
This story has been updated with a statement from Overstock President Stormy Simon.





















Suggest a correction





Alexis Kleinman




Deputy Managing Editor Of Impact & Innovation, The Huffington Post






MORE:

The Onion Overstock


Overstock


Overstock.Com


Overstock Video


Overstock Streaming





































A Fake Onion Story About Overstock.com Just Became A Reality




220

































CONVERSATIONS









































































Overstock.com - Wikipedia





















 






Overstock.com

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Stormy D. Simon)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Overstock.com, Inc.









Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: OSTK


Industry
Retail


Founded
May 1999; 18 years ago (1999-05)


Headquarters
Midvale, Utah, United States



Key people

Patrick Byrne, founder, CEO


Revenue
 US$ 1.8 billion (2016)



Operating income

 US$ 6.91 million (2016)



Net income

 US$ 12.52 million (2016)


Total assets
 US$485.08 million (2016)


Total equity
 US$175.33 million (2016)



Number of employees

1,800 (2017)


Website
Overstock.com


Overstock.com, Inc. is an American internet retailer headquartered in Midvale, Utah,[1] near Salt Lake City.[2] Patrick M. Byrne founded the company in 1997 and launched the company in May 1999. Overstock.com initially sold exclusively surplus and returned merchandise on an online e-commerce marketplace, liquidating the inventories of at least 18 failed dot-com companies at below-wholesale prices.[3] The company continues to sell home decor, furniture, bedding, and many other goods that are closeout merchandise,[4] however, it also sells new merchandise.[5]
In May 2002, Overstock held an IPO at a per-share price of $13, and after achieving significant growth and profits in some early quarters, achieved a profit of $7.7 million in 2009[6] and reported its first billion-dollar year in 2010. The business started rebranding in early 2011, as "O.co", to simplify and unify its international operations[7] but interrupted this effort a few months later, citing consumer confusion over the new name.[8]
Byrne took an indefinite leave of absence in April 2016, because of Hepatitis C complications. The general counsel, Mitch Edwards, was named acting CEO.[9] In July 2016, Byrne returned as CEO.



Contents


1 Business model, management and figures

1.1 Bitcoin


2 Naked short selling campaign
3 See also
4 References
5 External links



Business model, management and figures[edit]
Part of Overstock.com's merchandise is purchased by or manufactured specifically for the company. Among their products are handmade goods produced for Overstock by workers in developing nations.[10][11] The company also manages the inventory supply for other retailers. In addition to its direct retail sales, Overstock.com began offering online auctions on its website in 2004, known as Overstock.com Marketplace and later O.co Marketplace. This service was retired in July 2011.[12]
After initially relying solely on word-of-mouth marketing from customers,[13] the company turned to distinctive television advertisements starring German actress Sabine Ehrenfeld.[14][15] Later, they would employ other advertising spokespersons.
In July 2006, John J. Byrne, the father of Overstock's chief executive, resigned from the board of directors after a public airing of the elder Byrne's unhappiness with his son's actions against naked short-selling.[16] In August 2008, Jack Byrne said that after "much initial skepticism" he believed his son was "right all along" about the battle and lawsuits with short-sellers and analysts.[17] In 2010 the elder Byrne returned to the Overstock.com board of directors.
In early 2007, John A. Fisher and Ray Groves resigned from the Overstock board of directors over disagreement with the company's prime broker suit.[18][19]
On January 2, 2008,[20] Overstock announced that cofounder Jason Lindsey had resigned as President, COO, and as a Director of Overstock effective from December 31, 2007. Byrne said Lindsey had "played a decisive role getting [Overstock] back on track" after "I screwed it up a couple years ago".[21] Overstock stock dropped to a four-year low following the announcement,[22] which an analyst for investment bank Broadpoint Capital described as a "key loss".[23]
In 2011, revenues dropped 5 percent over a two-month penalty period imposed by Google. According to the Associated Press, Overstock set up fake websites linking back to its own site. Overstock said it was penalized in part for a practice of encouraging college and university websites to post links to Overstock pages so that students and faculty could receive discounts. As a result of the Google penalty, search results for certain products dropped in Google rankings.[24][25] During the same year, Overstock.com acquired naming rights to the former Oakland–Alameda County Coliseum, renaming it Overstock.com Coliseum.[26] The Coliseum was later rebranded O.co Coliseum, in keeping with Overstock's then-rebranding as O.co (in April 2016, the name O.co Coliseum was dropped in favor of Oakland-Alameda Coliseum).
In 2013, Overstock began promoting increased immigration. Overstock president Jonathan Johnson told the Los Angeles Times that his firm had struggled to hire enough computer programmers and software developers to expand the business. "We pay more, and they are still hard to fill", he said. "We need to be more free in letting people in. That helps us solve our border problem. No one goes through the window of a house if they can ring the doorbell and come in the front door."[27]
In 2014, Overstock began developing software that would allow it to distribute corporate stock online instead of using traditional methods like the New York Stock Exchange or NASDAQ.[28]
Overstock.com's Board of Directors on January 9, 2014, was Patrick Byrne, Jonathan E. Johnson III, Allison H. Abraham, Barclay F. Corbus, Samuel A. Mitchell, Stormy D. Simon, Joseph J. Tabacco, Jr. and Dr. Kirthi Kalyanam [29]
Bitcoin[edit]
On January 9, 2014, Overstock.com became the first major retailer to start accepting bitcoin as payments for its goods.[30] On the first day, they made sales worth US$126,000 in bitcoin.[31] This represents a 4.33% increase in sales from their normal income of $3 million per day.[32]
As of March 13, 2014, Overstock bitcoin income had shrunk to under 1% of their normal daily cash intake.[33]
In a community interview with social media site Reddit on May 3, 2014, in response to a question to the Overstock CEO Patrick Byrne about the percentage of revenue and transactions paid for in bitcoin, Byrne responded that the percentage was "Tiny. <.1%".[34] In mid-2014 Overstock.com announced that bitcoin sales were averaging $300,000 per month and that the company expected bitcoin sales to add 4 cents to the company's 2014 earnings per share.[35]
On September 14, 2014, Overstock announced it would begin donating 4% of bitcoin revenue to foundations that were advocating for cryptocurrency.[36]
Naked short selling campaign[edit]
The company has received attention stemming from CEO Patrick Byrne's battle against alleged naked short selling of his company's shares. Beginning in 2005, Byrne has contended that a number of companies, including Overstock.com, have been the targets of this practice, which involves selling a stock short but without the usual step of initially borrowing or locating the shares. Byrne alleges that the practice circumvents safeguards of conventional shorting, and has been used in large schemes devised to profit from driving down the prices of companies' shares, in many cases leading to these companies' failure. With Overstock, Byrne contends that the company's longstanding appearance on the Regulation SHO Threshold Security list, an SEC-mandated list showing companies with a high number of "fails to deliver", along with high trading volumes that sometimes surpass total quantity of the company's stock, establish that it has been targeted by this practice.[37] Byrne's campaign has been controversial, including criticism in the financial press that Byrne is seeking to divert attention from Overstock's share price declines and failure to turn a profit.[38] New York Times columnist Joseph Nocera has said in 2006 that, "Except for a few fellow-traveling Web sites, where Mr. Byrne is viewed as a heroic figure, most people who understand the issue or have looked into it think it's pretty bogus."[39] Others have suggested that the problem is real, but that the SEC acts to prevent it and that it does not happen on any scale such as Byrne suggests. SEC Chairman Christopher Cox called abusive naked short selling "a fraud that the commission is bound to prevent and to punish."[40]
Overstock filed a lawsuit against the hedge fund Rocker Partners in 2005, for libel, unfair business practices and tortious interference, saying it colluded with a research firm, Gradient Analytics, in short-selling the company while paying Gradient Analytics to publish negative reports about Overstock.com and supplying pre-publication copies to Rocker. Naked short-selling was not alleged in that suit.[41] In a conference call with analysts in August 2005, a day after the suit was filed, Byrne said that "there's been a plan since we were in our teens to destroy our stock, drive it down to $6--$10 ... and even a plan for how the company would then get whacked up." He said that the conspirators were part of a "Miscreants Ball", headed by a "Sith Lord", who he refused to identify but said "he's one of the master criminals from the 1980s." Byrne said the conspiracy included hedge funds, journalists, investigators, trial lawyers, the SEC, and Eliot Spitzer."[42] Gradient countersued, alleging Byrne waged a smear campaign.[43]
Rocker Partners, renamed Copper River Management, filed a counterclaim against Overstock in November 2007, alleging overstatement of profits, false projections, and misrepresentations about the company's ventures.[44] Copper River also alleges that Byrne tried to silence critics by suing them.[45][46][47][48] A portion of this suit was settled out of court on October 13, 2008, when Overstock.com and Gradient dropped the claims against each other after Gradient retracted allegations that Overstock's reporting methods did not comply with rules established by the FASB, stated they believed Overstock.com complied with GAAP standards, and that three directors were independent according to NASD standards, and apologized.[49][50] Byrne has said the apology and settlement "represents a great step forward in our case",[50] while Copper River's attorney stated that "If somehow this improved Overstock's case, then Gradient would admit to doing something wrong and they haven’t.", and that he expected the settlement to help Copper River's case.[51]
On December 8, 2009, it was announced that Copper River had reached an out of court settlement with Overstock. As part of the agreement, Copper River, which closed in December 2008, agreed to pay Overstock $5 million.[52] In a letter to his shareholders, Patrick Byrne said, "The good guys won". Copper River said in a statement that it continued to deny Overstock's allegations. Copper River managing general partner Marc Cohodes said "Although settlement deprives us of the ability to disprove Overstock's case and prosecute our counterclaims, we decided that the litigation costs did not justify passing up a practical way to end four-and-half years of meritless litigation by Overstock."[53][54]
In February 2007, Overstock.com launched a $3.5 billion lawsuit against Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs and other large Wall Street firms, alleging a "massive illegal stock market manipulation scheme" involving naked short selling. Among its allegations, Overstock stated that since at least January 2005, naked short selling has accounted for large portions of Overstock stock, in some cases exceeding the 23.4 million total shares outstanding.[55] The lawsuit alleged that this had created "immense downward pressure" on share prices over time. Kerry Fields, associate professor of law and business ethics at the University of Southern California, said, "Byrne may be able to help set new law if he handles this right." Fields said, Byrne's "best approach now is probably to persuade the SEC, which continues to wander around the issue, or the government to serve subpoenas and let them decide whether or not his company was wronged."[56] John Coffee, director of the Center on Corporate Governance at Columbia University Law School, described it as overly ambitious and "extremely unpromising."[55] Two members of the Overstock.com board of directors, John Fisher and Ray Groves, resigned in disagreement over the lawsuit.[57][58]
In December 2010, all but two of the prime broker defendants settled out of court with Overstock for $4.4 million.[59] That same month, the company filed a motion seeking to amend its lawsuit against the remaining defendants—Goldman Sachs and Merrill Lynch—to include claims of RICO violations. The enhanced claims were based on evidence gained through discovery in the case.[60]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



E-commerce
Online auction

References[edit]


^ Christensen, Lisa (October 14, 2016). "Overstock.com Unveils New Headquarters With Flair". Utah Business. Retrieved January 28, 2017. 
^ The postal designation of "Salt Lake City" is commonly used in the company's mailing address, and consequently in press releases; in 2005, the City of Cottonwood Heights incorporated, and "Cottonwood Heights" has since become an accepted postal designation, as well.
^ Glasner, Joanna (November 12, 2001). "Where the Dot-Dead Wind Up". Wired News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Kell, John. "Overstock.com's CEO Is Taking a Medical Leave of Absence". Forbes. Retrieved 20 April 2016. 
^ Nocera, Joe (March 10, 2007). "Revisiting Utah and Overstock". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock's brash CEO delivers 1st annual profit". Deseret News. April 5, 2010. 
^ "Overstock FAQs". Overstock.com. February 2, 2011. Retrieved February 2, 2011. 
^ Musil, Steven (November 14, 2011). "Overstock retreats from O.co name change". CNET News. Retrieved November 20, 2011. 
^ Goldman, David. "Overstock CEO Patrick Byrne takes indefinite leave of absence over Hepatitis C complications - Apr. 11, 2016". CNN. Retrieved 25 May 2016. 
^ Glasner, Joanna (June 25, 2004). "Overstocking in Afghanistan". Wired News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Dotson, Leslie. "Overstock.com Celebrates One-Year Anniversary of Worldstock, Its Socially Responsible Goods Department". Overstock.com. Business Wire. 
^ Steiner, Ina (July 15, 2011). "Overstock Closes Third-Party Marketplace after Seven Years". AuctionBytes. Retrieved March 12, 2012. 
^ Covell, Jeffrey (January 1, 2004). "International Directory of Company Histories, Volume 75 (2004)". FindArticles.com. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Stevenson, Seth (February 28, 2005). "What's With That Overstock.com Ad?". Slate (magazine). Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ D'Angelo, Jennifer (November 13, 2004). "Oh! Oh! Oh ... It's Another 'Sally' Ad". Fox News Channel. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock.com chairman mulls stepping down". MSNBC. Associated Press. March 3, 2006. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Jack Byrne legendary in insurance circles, April 8, 2008, The Salt Lake Tribune
^ Fisher, John (March 23, 2007). "Letter to Patrick Byrne from John A. Fisher, Overstock.com SEC filing". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved March 21, 2008. 
^ Groves, Ray (May 24, 2007). "Letter from Ray Groves to Patrick Byrne". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Burden, Kirstie (January 2, 2008). "Jason Lindsey Resigns as Director, President, and COO of Overstock.com". Overstock.com. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sage, Alexandria (January 2, 2008). "UPDATE 1-Overstock.com says co-founder Lindsey resigns". Reuters. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock.com At 4-Year Low On COO Resignation". RealTimeTraders news. January 4, 2008. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Koort, Robert (January 3, 2008). "Analyst Actions: Monsanto, Overstock.com, Murphy Oil, Digital River". BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Paul Foy (December 16, 2011). "Overstock.com unloads goods at Utah auction". Yahoo! Finance. Associated Press. 
^ Efrati, Amir (February 24, 2011). "Google Penalizes Overstock for Search Tactics – WSJ.com". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 1, 2012. 
^ Philip Matier, Andrew Ross (April 27, 2011). "New name in Oakland sports: Overstock.com Coliseum". The San Francisco Chronicle. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Brian Bennett and Lisa Mascaro, "Immigration bill would spark surge of legal arrivals", L.A. Times, April 13, 2013. http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/nation/la-na-legal-immigration-20130414,0,5787920.story
^ Metz, Cade (October 6, 2014). "Overstock.com Assembles Coders to Create a Bitcoin-Like Stock Market". Retrieved October 15, 2014. 
^ "Leadership". Overstock. Retrieved January 9, 2014. 
^ Metz, Cade (January 9, 2014). "The Grand Experiment Goes Live: Overstock.com Is Now Accepting Bitcoins". Wired. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ Metz, Cade (January 10, 2014). "In First Day With Bitcoin, Overstock Does $126,000 in Sales". Wired. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ Morpheus (January 10, 2014). "Overstock.com increases daily revenue 4.3% by adding bitcoin, first day". NeoMoney.net. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Wilhelm, Alex (March 13, 2014). "Overstock's Bitcoin Purchases Account for Less Than 1% of Revenue, But It's Growing". TechCrunch. Retrieved March 13, 2014. 
^ "I'm Patrick Byrne, a pro-freedom supporter of cryptocurrency and school vouchers, early critic of Wall Street, three time cancer survivor, journalist at DeepCapture.com, and CEO and founder of Overstock.com. AMA!". Reddit. May 3, 2014. Retrieved May 5, 2014. 
^ Chavez-Dreyfuss, Gertrude (August 13, 2014). "Overstock CEO says bitcoin sales to add 4 cents to 2014 EPS". Reuters/Yahoo! News. Retrieved August 18, 2014. 
^ "Overstock to Donate 4% of Bitcoin Revenue to Foundations Advocating Cryptocurrency Adoption". Overstock Investor Portal. September 14, 2014. Retrieved February 19, 2015. 
^ Burden, Kirstie (December 27, 2007). "Overstock Reappears on the Regulation SHO Threshold List". PR Newswire. Reuters. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Antilla, Susan (February 21, 2007). "Overstock Blames with Creepy Strategy". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Nocera, Joe (June 10, 2006). "New Crusade for Master of Overstock". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Norris, Floyd (July 14, 2007). "S.E.C. Ends Decades-Old Price Limits on Short Selling". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Nocera, Joe (February 25, 2006). "Overstock's Campaign Of Menace". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "The Phantom Menace", by Bethany McLean, Fortune Magazine, Nov. 15, 2005
^ Adam Tanner (May 8, 2008). "Fiesty Overstock.com CEO sees brighter future". Reuters. Retrieved 16 October 2016. 
^ "Copper River Files Countersuit Vs Overstock, CEO, Directors", by Carol Remond, Dow Jones News Service, November 10, 2007
^ McLean, Bethany (November 28, 2007). "Overstock.com drama spurs lawsuits". Fortune. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Mitchell, Dan (January 20, 2007). "Flames Flare Over Naked Shorts". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (January 2, 2007). "Overstock.com Lashes Out at Critics on the Web". New York Post. Archived from the original on February 29, 2008. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Antilla, Susan (February 11, 2007). "Overstock Blames With Creepy Strategy". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sage, Alexandria (October 13, 2008). "Overstock says settled claims against Gradient". Business & Finance. Reuters. Retrieved October 17, 2008. 
^ a b Beebe, Paul (October 13, 2008). "Overstock.com settles suit with research firm". The Salt Lake Tribune. Retrieved October 17, 2008. 
^ "Industry News-Institutional and Traditional Investment News-eVestment – Institutional Investment – Hedge Fund News – Pension Fund Media Coverage". Hedgefund.net. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ "Overstock says it settles with hedge fund". Reuters. December 8, 2008. Retrieved December 9, 2009. 
^ Inc, Overstock (December 8, 2009). "Rocker Pays $5 Million to Overstock.com to Settle Lawsuit". Press Release. Retrieved December 8, 2009. 
^ "Copper River Partners Settles Lawsuit with Overstock.com, Inc.". PR Newswire. December 9, 2009. Retrieved December 9, 2009. 
^ a b King, Danny (February 3, 2007). "Overstock sues brokers". Deseret Morning News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sandoval, Greg (March 28, 2007). "Overstock CEO reflects on Cramer debacle". CNET News. Archived from the original on July 10, 2012. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ King, Danny (February 24, 2007). "Overstock's Suit Spurs Board Exit". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ King, Danny (May 25, 2007). "Overstock Director Groves Resigns Because of Broker Lawsuit". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Form 8-K for OVERSTOCK.COM, INC". Yahoo. Archived from the original on June 28, 2011. Retrieved November 3, 2013. 
^ [1] Archived June 29, 2011, at the Wayback Machine.


External links[edit]

Overstock.com
Five-year stock price
"Overstock.com Rezzes Into Second Life", CNN ireport.com, 2008-05-02. Retrieved on 2008-05-02.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Overstock.com&oldid=788495287#Board_of_directors"					
Categories: Companies based in UtahOnline companiesInternet properties established in 1997Online retailers of the United States1997 establishments in UtahCompanies listed on NASDAQHidden categories: CS1 maint: Uses authors parameterWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from February 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


FrançaisNederlandsРусскийSimple English 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 19:14.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Overstock.com - Wikipedia





















 






Overstock.com

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Stormy D. Simon)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Overstock.com, Inc.









Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: OSTK


Industry
Retail


Founded
May 1999; 18 years ago (1999-05)


Headquarters
Midvale, Utah, United States



Key people

Patrick Byrne, founder, CEO


Revenue
 US$ 1.8 billion (2016)



Operating income

 US$ 6.91 million (2016)



Net income

 US$ 12.52 million (2016)


Total assets
 US$485.08 million (2016)


Total equity
 US$175.33 million (2016)



Number of employees

1,800 (2017)


Website
Overstock.com


Overstock.com, Inc. is an American internet retailer headquartered in Midvale, Utah,[1] near Salt Lake City.[2] Patrick M. Byrne founded the company in 1997 and launched the company in May 1999. Overstock.com initially sold exclusively surplus and returned merchandise on an online e-commerce marketplace, liquidating the inventories of at least 18 failed dot-com companies at below-wholesale prices.[3] The company continues to sell home decor, furniture, bedding, and many other goods that are closeout merchandise,[4] however, it also sells new merchandise.[5]
In May 2002, Overstock held an IPO at a per-share price of $13, and after achieving significant growth and profits in some early quarters, achieved a profit of $7.7 million in 2009[6] and reported its first billion-dollar year in 2010. The business started rebranding in early 2011, as "O.co", to simplify and unify its international operations[7] but interrupted this effort a few months later, citing consumer confusion over the new name.[8]
Byrne took an indefinite leave of absence in April 2016, because of Hepatitis C complications. The general counsel, Mitch Edwards, was named acting CEO.[9] In July 2016, Byrne returned as CEO.



Contents


1 Business model, management and figures

1.1 Bitcoin


2 Naked short selling campaign
3 See also
4 References
5 External links



Business model, management and figures[edit]
Part of Overstock.com's merchandise is purchased by or manufactured specifically for the company. Among their products are handmade goods produced for Overstock by workers in developing nations.[10][11] The company also manages the inventory supply for other retailers. In addition to its direct retail sales, Overstock.com began offering online auctions on its website in 2004, known as Overstock.com Marketplace and later O.co Marketplace. This service was retired in July 2011.[12]
After initially relying solely on word-of-mouth marketing from customers,[13] the company turned to distinctive television advertisements starring German actress Sabine Ehrenfeld.[14][15] Later, they would employ other advertising spokespersons.
In July 2006, John J. Byrne, the father of Overstock's chief executive, resigned from the board of directors after a public airing of the elder Byrne's unhappiness with his son's actions against naked short-selling.[16] In August 2008, Jack Byrne said that after "much initial skepticism" he believed his son was "right all along" about the battle and lawsuits with short-sellers and analysts.[17] In 2010 the elder Byrne returned to the Overstock.com board of directors.
In early 2007, John A. Fisher and Ray Groves resigned from the Overstock board of directors over disagreement with the company's prime broker suit.[18][19]
On January 2, 2008,[20] Overstock announced that cofounder Jason Lindsey had resigned as President, COO, and as a Director of Overstock effective from December 31, 2007. Byrne said Lindsey had "played a decisive role getting [Overstock] back on track" after "I screwed it up a couple years ago".[21] Overstock stock dropped to a four-year low following the announcement,[22] which an analyst for investment bank Broadpoint Capital described as a "key loss".[23]
In 2011, revenues dropped 5 percent over a two-month penalty period imposed by Google. According to the Associated Press, Overstock set up fake websites linking back to its own site. Overstock said it was penalized in part for a practice of encouraging college and university websites to post links to Overstock pages so that students and faculty could receive discounts. As a result of the Google penalty, search results for certain products dropped in Google rankings.[24][25] During the same year, Overstock.com acquired naming rights to the former Oakland–Alameda County Coliseum, renaming it Overstock.com Coliseum.[26] The Coliseum was later rebranded O.co Coliseum, in keeping with Overstock's then-rebranding as O.co (in April 2016, the name O.co Coliseum was dropped in favor of Oakland-Alameda Coliseum).
In 2013, Overstock began promoting increased immigration. Overstock president Jonathan Johnson told the Los Angeles Times that his firm had struggled to hire enough computer programmers and software developers to expand the business. "We pay more, and they are still hard to fill", he said. "We need to be more free in letting people in. That helps us solve our border problem. No one goes through the window of a house if they can ring the doorbell and come in the front door."[27]
In 2014, Overstock began developing software that would allow it to distribute corporate stock online instead of using traditional methods like the New York Stock Exchange or NASDAQ.[28]
Overstock.com's Board of Directors on January 9, 2014, was Patrick Byrne, Jonathan E. Johnson III, Allison H. Abraham, Barclay F. Corbus, Samuel A. Mitchell, Stormy D. Simon, Joseph J. Tabacco, Jr. and Dr. Kirthi Kalyanam [29]
Bitcoin[edit]
On January 9, 2014, Overstock.com became the first major retailer to start accepting bitcoin as payments for its goods.[30] On the first day, they made sales worth US$126,000 in bitcoin.[31] This represents a 4.33% increase in sales from their normal income of $3 million per day.[32]
As of March 13, 2014, Overstock bitcoin income had shrunk to under 1% of their normal daily cash intake.[33]
In a community interview with social media site Reddit on May 3, 2014, in response to a question to the Overstock CEO Patrick Byrne about the percentage of revenue and transactions paid for in bitcoin, Byrne responded that the percentage was "Tiny. <.1%".[34] In mid-2014 Overstock.com announced that bitcoin sales were averaging $300,000 per month and that the company expected bitcoin sales to add 4 cents to the company's 2014 earnings per share.[35]
On September 14, 2014, Overstock announced it would begin donating 4% of bitcoin revenue to foundations that were advocating for cryptocurrency.[36]
Naked short selling campaign[edit]
The company has received attention stemming from CEO Patrick Byrne's battle against alleged naked short selling of his company's shares. Beginning in 2005, Byrne has contended that a number of companies, including Overstock.com, have been the targets of this practice, which involves selling a stock short but without the usual step of initially borrowing or locating the shares. Byrne alleges that the practice circumvents safeguards of conventional shorting, and has been used in large schemes devised to profit from driving down the prices of companies' shares, in many cases leading to these companies' failure. With Overstock, Byrne contends that the company's longstanding appearance on the Regulation SHO Threshold Security list, an SEC-mandated list showing companies with a high number of "fails to deliver", along with high trading volumes that sometimes surpass total quantity of the company's stock, establish that it has been targeted by this practice.[37] Byrne's campaign has been controversial, including criticism in the financial press that Byrne is seeking to divert attention from Overstock's share price declines and failure to turn a profit.[38] New York Times columnist Joseph Nocera has said in 2006 that, "Except for a few fellow-traveling Web sites, where Mr. Byrne is viewed as a heroic figure, most people who understand the issue or have looked into it think it's pretty bogus."[39] Others have suggested that the problem is real, but that the SEC acts to prevent it and that it does not happen on any scale such as Byrne suggests. SEC Chairman Christopher Cox called abusive naked short selling "a fraud that the commission is bound to prevent and to punish."[40]
Overstock filed a lawsuit against the hedge fund Rocker Partners in 2005, for libel, unfair business practices and tortious interference, saying it colluded with a research firm, Gradient Analytics, in short-selling the company while paying Gradient Analytics to publish negative reports about Overstock.com and supplying pre-publication copies to Rocker. Naked short-selling was not alleged in that suit.[41] In a conference call with analysts in August 2005, a day after the suit was filed, Byrne said that "there's been a plan since we were in our teens to destroy our stock, drive it down to $6--$10 ... and even a plan for how the company would then get whacked up." He said that the conspirators were part of a "Miscreants Ball", headed by a "Sith Lord", who he refused to identify but said "he's one of the master criminals from the 1980s." Byrne said the conspiracy included hedge funds, journalists, investigators, trial lawyers, the SEC, and Eliot Spitzer."[42] Gradient countersued, alleging Byrne waged a smear campaign.[43]
Rocker Partners, renamed Copper River Management, filed a counterclaim against Overstock in November 2007, alleging overstatement of profits, false projections, and misrepresentations about the company's ventures.[44] Copper River also alleges that Byrne tried to silence critics by suing them.[45][46][47][48] A portion of this suit was settled out of court on October 13, 2008, when Overstock.com and Gradient dropped the claims against each other after Gradient retracted allegations that Overstock's reporting methods did not comply with rules established by the FASB, stated they believed Overstock.com complied with GAAP standards, and that three directors were independent according to NASD standards, and apologized.[49][50] Byrne has said the apology and settlement "represents a great step forward in our case",[50] while Copper River's attorney stated that "If somehow this improved Overstock's case, then Gradient would admit to doing something wrong and they haven’t.", and that he expected the settlement to help Copper River's case.[51]
On December 8, 2009, it was announced that Copper River had reached an out of court settlement with Overstock. As part of the agreement, Copper River, which closed in December 2008, agreed to pay Overstock $5 million.[52] In a letter to his shareholders, Patrick Byrne said, "The good guys won". Copper River said in a statement that it continued to deny Overstock's allegations. Copper River managing general partner Marc Cohodes said "Although settlement deprives us of the ability to disprove Overstock's case and prosecute our counterclaims, we decided that the litigation costs did not justify passing up a practical way to end four-and-half years of meritless litigation by Overstock."[53][54]
In February 2007, Overstock.com launched a $3.5 billion lawsuit against Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs and other large Wall Street firms, alleging a "massive illegal stock market manipulation scheme" involving naked short selling. Among its allegations, Overstock stated that since at least January 2005, naked short selling has accounted for large portions of Overstock stock, in some cases exceeding the 23.4 million total shares outstanding.[55] The lawsuit alleged that this had created "immense downward pressure" on share prices over time. Kerry Fields, associate professor of law and business ethics at the University of Southern California, said, "Byrne may be able to help set new law if he handles this right." Fields said, Byrne's "best approach now is probably to persuade the SEC, which continues to wander around the issue, or the government to serve subpoenas and let them decide whether or not his company was wronged."[56] John Coffee, director of the Center on Corporate Governance at Columbia University Law School, described it as overly ambitious and "extremely unpromising."[55] Two members of the Overstock.com board of directors, John Fisher and Ray Groves, resigned in disagreement over the lawsuit.[57][58]
In December 2010, all but two of the prime broker defendants settled out of court with Overstock for $4.4 million.[59] That same month, the company filed a motion seeking to amend its lawsuit against the remaining defendants—Goldman Sachs and Merrill Lynch—to include claims of RICO violations. The enhanced claims were based on evidence gained through discovery in the case.[60]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



E-commerce
Online auction

References[edit]


^ Christensen, Lisa (October 14, 2016). "Overstock.com Unveils New Headquarters With Flair". Utah Business. Retrieved January 28, 2017. 
^ The postal designation of "Salt Lake City" is commonly used in the company's mailing address, and consequently in press releases; in 2005, the City of Cottonwood Heights incorporated, and "Cottonwood Heights" has since become an accepted postal designation, as well.
^ Glasner, Joanna (November 12, 2001). "Where the Dot-Dead Wind Up". Wired News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Kell, John. "Overstock.com's CEO Is Taking a Medical Leave of Absence". Forbes. Retrieved 20 April 2016. 
^ Nocera, Joe (March 10, 2007). "Revisiting Utah and Overstock". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock's brash CEO delivers 1st annual profit". Deseret News. April 5, 2010. 
^ "Overstock FAQs". Overstock.com. February 2, 2011. Retrieved February 2, 2011. 
^ Musil, Steven (November 14, 2011). "Overstock retreats from O.co name change". CNET News. Retrieved November 20, 2011. 
^ Goldman, David. "Overstock CEO Patrick Byrne takes indefinite leave of absence over Hepatitis C complications - Apr. 11, 2016". CNN. Retrieved 25 May 2016. 
^ Glasner, Joanna (June 25, 2004). "Overstocking in Afghanistan". Wired News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Dotson, Leslie. "Overstock.com Celebrates One-Year Anniversary of Worldstock, Its Socially Responsible Goods Department". Overstock.com. Business Wire. 
^ Steiner, Ina (July 15, 2011). "Overstock Closes Third-Party Marketplace after Seven Years". AuctionBytes. Retrieved March 12, 2012. 
^ Covell, Jeffrey (January 1, 2004). "International Directory of Company Histories, Volume 75 (2004)". FindArticles.com. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Stevenson, Seth (February 28, 2005). "What's With That Overstock.com Ad?". Slate (magazine). Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ D'Angelo, Jennifer (November 13, 2004). "Oh! Oh! Oh ... It's Another 'Sally' Ad". Fox News Channel. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock.com chairman mulls stepping down". MSNBC. Associated Press. March 3, 2006. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Jack Byrne legendary in insurance circles, April 8, 2008, The Salt Lake Tribune
^ Fisher, John (March 23, 2007). "Letter to Patrick Byrne from John A. Fisher, Overstock.com SEC filing". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved March 21, 2008. 
^ Groves, Ray (May 24, 2007). "Letter from Ray Groves to Patrick Byrne". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Burden, Kirstie (January 2, 2008). "Jason Lindsey Resigns as Director, President, and COO of Overstock.com". Overstock.com. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sage, Alexandria (January 2, 2008). "UPDATE 1-Overstock.com says co-founder Lindsey resigns". Reuters. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock.com At 4-Year Low On COO Resignation". RealTimeTraders news. January 4, 2008. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Koort, Robert (January 3, 2008). "Analyst Actions: Monsanto, Overstock.com, Murphy Oil, Digital River". BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Paul Foy (December 16, 2011). "Overstock.com unloads goods at Utah auction". Yahoo! Finance. Associated Press. 
^ Efrati, Amir (February 24, 2011). "Google Penalizes Overstock for Search Tactics – WSJ.com". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 1, 2012. 
^ Philip Matier, Andrew Ross (April 27, 2011). "New name in Oakland sports: Overstock.com Coliseum". The San Francisco Chronicle. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Brian Bennett and Lisa Mascaro, "Immigration bill would spark surge of legal arrivals", L.A. Times, April 13, 2013. http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/nation/la-na-legal-immigration-20130414,0,5787920.story
^ Metz, Cade (October 6, 2014). "Overstock.com Assembles Coders to Create a Bitcoin-Like Stock Market". Retrieved October 15, 2014. 
^ "Leadership". Overstock. Retrieved January 9, 2014. 
^ Metz, Cade (January 9, 2014). "The Grand Experiment Goes Live: Overstock.com Is Now Accepting Bitcoins". Wired. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ Metz, Cade (January 10, 2014). "In First Day With Bitcoin, Overstock Does $126,000 in Sales". Wired. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ Morpheus (January 10, 2014). "Overstock.com increases daily revenue 4.3% by adding bitcoin, first day". NeoMoney.net. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Wilhelm, Alex (March 13, 2014). "Overstock's Bitcoin Purchases Account for Less Than 1% of Revenue, But It's Growing". TechCrunch. Retrieved March 13, 2014. 
^ "I'm Patrick Byrne, a pro-freedom supporter of cryptocurrency and school vouchers, early critic of Wall Street, three time cancer survivor, journalist at DeepCapture.com, and CEO and founder of Overstock.com. AMA!". Reddit. May 3, 2014. Retrieved May 5, 2014. 
^ Chavez-Dreyfuss, Gertrude (August 13, 2014). "Overstock CEO says bitcoin sales to add 4 cents to 2014 EPS". Reuters/Yahoo! News. Retrieved August 18, 2014. 
^ "Overstock to Donate 4% of Bitcoin Revenue to Foundations Advocating Cryptocurrency Adoption". Overstock Investor Portal. September 14, 2014. Retrieved February 19, 2015. 
^ Burden, Kirstie (December 27, 2007). "Overstock Reappears on the Regulation SHO Threshold List". PR Newswire. Reuters. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Antilla, Susan (February 21, 2007). "Overstock Blames with Creepy Strategy". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Nocera, Joe (June 10, 2006). "New Crusade for Master of Overstock". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Norris, Floyd (July 14, 2007). "S.E.C. Ends Decades-Old Price Limits on Short Selling". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Nocera, Joe (February 25, 2006). "Overstock's Campaign Of Menace". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "The Phantom Menace", by Bethany McLean, Fortune Magazine, Nov. 15, 2005
^ Adam Tanner (May 8, 2008). "Fiesty Overstock.com CEO sees brighter future". Reuters. Retrieved 16 October 2016. 
^ "Copper River Files Countersuit Vs Overstock, CEO, Directors", by Carol Remond, Dow Jones News Service, November 10, 2007
^ McLean, Bethany (November 28, 2007). "Overstock.com drama spurs lawsuits". Fortune. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Mitchell, Dan (January 20, 2007). "Flames Flare Over Naked Shorts". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (January 2, 2007). "Overstock.com Lashes Out at Critics on the Web". New York Post. Archived from the original on February 29, 2008. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Antilla, Susan (February 11, 2007). "Overstock Blames With Creepy Strategy". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sage, Alexandria (October 13, 2008). "Overstock says settled claims against Gradient". Business & Finance. Reuters. Retrieved October 17, 2008. 
^ a b Beebe, Paul (October 13, 2008). "Overstock.com settles suit with research firm". The Salt Lake Tribune. Retrieved October 17, 2008. 
^ "Industry News-Institutional and Traditional Investment News-eVestment – Institutional Investment – Hedge Fund News – Pension Fund Media Coverage". Hedgefund.net. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ "Overstock says it settles with hedge fund". Reuters. December 8, 2008. Retrieved December 9, 2009. 
^ Inc, Overstock (December 8, 2009). "Rocker Pays $5 Million to Overstock.com to Settle Lawsuit". Press Release. Retrieved December 8, 2009. 
^ "Copper River Partners Settles Lawsuit with Overstock.com, Inc.". PR Newswire. December 9, 2009. Retrieved December 9, 2009. 
^ a b King, Danny (February 3, 2007). "Overstock sues brokers". Deseret Morning News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sandoval, Greg (March 28, 2007). "Overstock CEO reflects on Cramer debacle". CNET News. Archived from the original on July 10, 2012. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ King, Danny (February 24, 2007). "Overstock's Suit Spurs Board Exit". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ King, Danny (May 25, 2007). "Overstock Director Groves Resigns Because of Broker Lawsuit". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Form 8-K for OVERSTOCK.COM, INC". Yahoo. Archived from the original on June 28, 2011. Retrieved November 3, 2013. 
^ [1] Archived June 29, 2011, at the Wayback Machine.


External links[edit]

Overstock.com
Five-year stock price
"Overstock.com Rezzes Into Second Life", CNN ireport.com, 2008-05-02. Retrieved on 2008-05-02.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Overstock.com&oldid=788495287#Board_of_directors"					
Categories: Companies based in UtahOnline companiesInternet properties established in 1997Online retailers of the United States1997 establishments in UtahCompanies listed on NASDAQHidden categories: CS1 maint: Uses authors parameterWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from February 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


FrançaisNederlandsРусскийSimple English 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 19:14.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Overstock.com - Wikipedia





















 






Overstock.com

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Stormy D. Simon)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Overstock.com, Inc.









Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: OSTK


Industry
Retail


Founded
May 1999; 18 years ago (1999-05)


Headquarters
Midvale, Utah, United States



Key people

Patrick Byrne, founder, CEO


Revenue
 US$ 1.8 billion (2016)



Operating income

 US$ 6.91 million (2016)



Net income

 US$ 12.52 million (2016)


Total assets
 US$485.08 million (2016)


Total equity
 US$175.33 million (2016)



Number of employees

1,800 (2017)


Website
Overstock.com


Overstock.com, Inc. is an American internet retailer headquartered in Midvale, Utah,[1] near Salt Lake City.[2] Patrick M. Byrne founded the company in 1997 and launched the company in May 1999. Overstock.com initially sold exclusively surplus and returned merchandise on an online e-commerce marketplace, liquidating the inventories of at least 18 failed dot-com companies at below-wholesale prices.[3] The company continues to sell home decor, furniture, bedding, and many other goods that are closeout merchandise,[4] however, it also sells new merchandise.[5]
In May 2002, Overstock held an IPO at a per-share price of $13, and after achieving significant growth and profits in some early quarters, achieved a profit of $7.7 million in 2009[6] and reported its first billion-dollar year in 2010. The business started rebranding in early 2011, as "O.co", to simplify and unify its international operations[7] but interrupted this effort a few months later, citing consumer confusion over the new name.[8]
Byrne took an indefinite leave of absence in April 2016, because of Hepatitis C complications. The general counsel, Mitch Edwards, was named acting CEO.[9] In July 2016, Byrne returned as CEO.



Contents


1 Business model, management and figures

1.1 Bitcoin


2 Naked short selling campaign
3 See also
4 References
5 External links



Business model, management and figures[edit]
Part of Overstock.com's merchandise is purchased by or manufactured specifically for the company. Among their products are handmade goods produced for Overstock by workers in developing nations.[10][11] The company also manages the inventory supply for other retailers. In addition to its direct retail sales, Overstock.com began offering online auctions on its website in 2004, known as Overstock.com Marketplace and later O.co Marketplace. This service was retired in July 2011.[12]
After initially relying solely on word-of-mouth marketing from customers,[13] the company turned to distinctive television advertisements starring German actress Sabine Ehrenfeld.[14][15] Later, they would employ other advertising spokespersons.
In July 2006, John J. Byrne, the father of Overstock's chief executive, resigned from the board of directors after a public airing of the elder Byrne's unhappiness with his son's actions against naked short-selling.[16] In August 2008, Jack Byrne said that after "much initial skepticism" he believed his son was "right all along" about the battle and lawsuits with short-sellers and analysts.[17] In 2010 the elder Byrne returned to the Overstock.com board of directors.
In early 2007, John A. Fisher and Ray Groves resigned from the Overstock board of directors over disagreement with the company's prime broker suit.[18][19]
On January 2, 2008,[20] Overstock announced that cofounder Jason Lindsey had resigned as President, COO, and as a Director of Overstock effective from December 31, 2007. Byrne said Lindsey had "played a decisive role getting [Overstock] back on track" after "I screwed it up a couple years ago".[21] Overstock stock dropped to a four-year low following the announcement,[22] which an analyst for investment bank Broadpoint Capital described as a "key loss".[23]
In 2011, revenues dropped 5 percent over a two-month penalty period imposed by Google. According to the Associated Press, Overstock set up fake websites linking back to its own site. Overstock said it was penalized in part for a practice of encouraging college and university websites to post links to Overstock pages so that students and faculty could receive discounts. As a result of the Google penalty, search results for certain products dropped in Google rankings.[24][25] During the same year, Overstock.com acquired naming rights to the former Oakland–Alameda County Coliseum, renaming it Overstock.com Coliseum.[26] The Coliseum was later rebranded O.co Coliseum, in keeping with Overstock's then-rebranding as O.co (in April 2016, the name O.co Coliseum was dropped in favor of Oakland-Alameda Coliseum).
In 2013, Overstock began promoting increased immigration. Overstock president Jonathan Johnson told the Los Angeles Times that his firm had struggled to hire enough computer programmers and software developers to expand the business. "We pay more, and they are still hard to fill", he said. "We need to be more free in letting people in. That helps us solve our border problem. No one goes through the window of a house if they can ring the doorbell and come in the front door."[27]
In 2014, Overstock began developing software that would allow it to distribute corporate stock online instead of using traditional methods like the New York Stock Exchange or NASDAQ.[28]
Overstock.com's Board of Directors on January 9, 2014, was Patrick Byrne, Jonathan E. Johnson III, Allison H. Abraham, Barclay F. Corbus, Samuel A. Mitchell, Stormy D. Simon, Joseph J. Tabacco, Jr. and Dr. Kirthi Kalyanam [29]
Bitcoin[edit]
On January 9, 2014, Overstock.com became the first major retailer to start accepting bitcoin as payments for its goods.[30] On the first day, they made sales worth US$126,000 in bitcoin.[31] This represents a 4.33% increase in sales from their normal income of $3 million per day.[32]
As of March 13, 2014, Overstock bitcoin income had shrunk to under 1% of their normal daily cash intake.[33]
In a community interview with social media site Reddit on May 3, 2014, in response to a question to the Overstock CEO Patrick Byrne about the percentage of revenue and transactions paid for in bitcoin, Byrne responded that the percentage was "Tiny. <.1%".[34] In mid-2014 Overstock.com announced that bitcoin sales were averaging $300,000 per month and that the company expected bitcoin sales to add 4 cents to the company's 2014 earnings per share.[35]
On September 14, 2014, Overstock announced it would begin donating 4% of bitcoin revenue to foundations that were advocating for cryptocurrency.[36]
Naked short selling campaign[edit]
The company has received attention stemming from CEO Patrick Byrne's battle against alleged naked short selling of his company's shares. Beginning in 2005, Byrne has contended that a number of companies, including Overstock.com, have been the targets of this practice, which involves selling a stock short but without the usual step of initially borrowing or locating the shares. Byrne alleges that the practice circumvents safeguards of conventional shorting, and has been used in large schemes devised to profit from driving down the prices of companies' shares, in many cases leading to these companies' failure. With Overstock, Byrne contends that the company's longstanding appearance on the Regulation SHO Threshold Security list, an SEC-mandated list showing companies with a high number of "fails to deliver", along with high trading volumes that sometimes surpass total quantity of the company's stock, establish that it has been targeted by this practice.[37] Byrne's campaign has been controversial, including criticism in the financial press that Byrne is seeking to divert attention from Overstock's share price declines and failure to turn a profit.[38] New York Times columnist Joseph Nocera has said in 2006 that, "Except for a few fellow-traveling Web sites, where Mr. Byrne is viewed as a heroic figure, most people who understand the issue or have looked into it think it's pretty bogus."[39] Others have suggested that the problem is real, but that the SEC acts to prevent it and that it does not happen on any scale such as Byrne suggests. SEC Chairman Christopher Cox called abusive naked short selling "a fraud that the commission is bound to prevent and to punish."[40]
Overstock filed a lawsuit against the hedge fund Rocker Partners in 2005, for libel, unfair business practices and tortious interference, saying it colluded with a research firm, Gradient Analytics, in short-selling the company while paying Gradient Analytics to publish negative reports about Overstock.com and supplying pre-publication copies to Rocker. Naked short-selling was not alleged in that suit.[41] In a conference call with analysts in August 2005, a day after the suit was filed, Byrne said that "there's been a plan since we were in our teens to destroy our stock, drive it down to $6--$10 ... and even a plan for how the company would then get whacked up." He said that the conspirators were part of a "Miscreants Ball", headed by a "Sith Lord", who he refused to identify but said "he's one of the master criminals from the 1980s." Byrne said the conspiracy included hedge funds, journalists, investigators, trial lawyers, the SEC, and Eliot Spitzer."[42] Gradient countersued, alleging Byrne waged a smear campaign.[43]
Rocker Partners, renamed Copper River Management, filed a counterclaim against Overstock in November 2007, alleging overstatement of profits, false projections, and misrepresentations about the company's ventures.[44] Copper River also alleges that Byrne tried to silence critics by suing them.[45][46][47][48] A portion of this suit was settled out of court on October 13, 2008, when Overstock.com and Gradient dropped the claims against each other after Gradient retracted allegations that Overstock's reporting methods did not comply with rules established by the FASB, stated they believed Overstock.com complied with GAAP standards, and that three directors were independent according to NASD standards, and apologized.[49][50] Byrne has said the apology and settlement "represents a great step forward in our case",[50] while Copper River's attorney stated that "If somehow this improved Overstock's case, then Gradient would admit to doing something wrong and they haven’t.", and that he expected the settlement to help Copper River's case.[51]
On December 8, 2009, it was announced that Copper River had reached an out of court settlement with Overstock. As part of the agreement, Copper River, which closed in December 2008, agreed to pay Overstock $5 million.[52] In a letter to his shareholders, Patrick Byrne said, "The good guys won". Copper River said in a statement that it continued to deny Overstock's allegations. Copper River managing general partner Marc Cohodes said "Although settlement deprives us of the ability to disprove Overstock's case and prosecute our counterclaims, we decided that the litigation costs did not justify passing up a practical way to end four-and-half years of meritless litigation by Overstock."[53][54]
In February 2007, Overstock.com launched a $3.5 billion lawsuit against Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs and other large Wall Street firms, alleging a "massive illegal stock market manipulation scheme" involving naked short selling. Among its allegations, Overstock stated that since at least January 2005, naked short selling has accounted for large portions of Overstock stock, in some cases exceeding the 23.4 million total shares outstanding.[55] The lawsuit alleged that this had created "immense downward pressure" on share prices over time. Kerry Fields, associate professor of law and business ethics at the University of Southern California, said, "Byrne may be able to help set new law if he handles this right." Fields said, Byrne's "best approach now is probably to persuade the SEC, which continues to wander around the issue, or the government to serve subpoenas and let them decide whether or not his company was wronged."[56] John Coffee, director of the Center on Corporate Governance at Columbia University Law School, described it as overly ambitious and "extremely unpromising."[55] Two members of the Overstock.com board of directors, John Fisher and Ray Groves, resigned in disagreement over the lawsuit.[57][58]
In December 2010, all but two of the prime broker defendants settled out of court with Overstock for $4.4 million.[59] That same month, the company filed a motion seeking to amend its lawsuit against the remaining defendants—Goldman Sachs and Merrill Lynch—to include claims of RICO violations. The enhanced claims were based on evidence gained through discovery in the case.[60]
See also[edit]


Companies portal



E-commerce
Online auction

References[edit]


^ Christensen, Lisa (October 14, 2016). "Overstock.com Unveils New Headquarters With Flair". Utah Business. Retrieved January 28, 2017. 
^ The postal designation of "Salt Lake City" is commonly used in the company's mailing address, and consequently in press releases; in 2005, the City of Cottonwood Heights incorporated, and "Cottonwood Heights" has since become an accepted postal designation, as well.
^ Glasner, Joanna (November 12, 2001). "Where the Dot-Dead Wind Up". Wired News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Kell, John. "Overstock.com's CEO Is Taking a Medical Leave of Absence". Forbes. Retrieved 20 April 2016. 
^ Nocera, Joe (March 10, 2007). "Revisiting Utah and Overstock". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock's brash CEO delivers 1st annual profit". Deseret News. April 5, 2010. 
^ "Overstock FAQs". Overstock.com. February 2, 2011. Retrieved February 2, 2011. 
^ Musil, Steven (November 14, 2011). "Overstock retreats from O.co name change". CNET News. Retrieved November 20, 2011. 
^ Goldman, David. "Overstock CEO Patrick Byrne takes indefinite leave of absence over Hepatitis C complications - Apr. 11, 2016". CNN. Retrieved 25 May 2016. 
^ Glasner, Joanna (June 25, 2004). "Overstocking in Afghanistan". Wired News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Dotson, Leslie. "Overstock.com Celebrates One-Year Anniversary of Worldstock, Its Socially Responsible Goods Department". Overstock.com. Business Wire. 
^ Steiner, Ina (July 15, 2011). "Overstock Closes Third-Party Marketplace after Seven Years". AuctionBytes. Retrieved March 12, 2012. 
^ Covell, Jeffrey (January 1, 2004). "International Directory of Company Histories, Volume 75 (2004)". FindArticles.com. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Stevenson, Seth (February 28, 2005). "What's With That Overstock.com Ad?". Slate (magazine). Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ D'Angelo, Jennifer (November 13, 2004). "Oh! Oh! Oh ... It's Another 'Sally' Ad". Fox News Channel. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock.com chairman mulls stepping down". MSNBC. Associated Press. March 3, 2006. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Jack Byrne legendary in insurance circles, April 8, 2008, The Salt Lake Tribune
^ Fisher, John (March 23, 2007). "Letter to Patrick Byrne from John A. Fisher, Overstock.com SEC filing". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved March 21, 2008. 
^ Groves, Ray (May 24, 2007). "Letter from Ray Groves to Patrick Byrne". U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Burden, Kirstie (January 2, 2008). "Jason Lindsey Resigns as Director, President, and COO of Overstock.com". Overstock.com. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sage, Alexandria (January 2, 2008). "UPDATE 1-Overstock.com says co-founder Lindsey resigns". Reuters. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Overstock.com At 4-Year Low On COO Resignation". RealTimeTraders news. January 4, 2008. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Koort, Robert (January 3, 2008). "Analyst Actions: Monsanto, Overstock.com, Murphy Oil, Digital River". BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Paul Foy (December 16, 2011). "Overstock.com unloads goods at Utah auction". Yahoo! Finance. Associated Press. 
^ Efrati, Amir (February 24, 2011). "Google Penalizes Overstock for Search Tactics – WSJ.com". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 1, 2012. 
^ Philip Matier, Andrew Ross (April 27, 2011). "New name in Oakland sports: Overstock.com Coliseum". The San Francisco Chronicle. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ Brian Bennett and Lisa Mascaro, "Immigration bill would spark surge of legal arrivals", L.A. Times, April 13, 2013. http://www.latimes.com/news/nationworld/nation/la-na-legal-immigration-20130414,0,5787920.story
^ Metz, Cade (October 6, 2014). "Overstock.com Assembles Coders to Create a Bitcoin-Like Stock Market". Retrieved October 15, 2014. 
^ "Leadership". Overstock. Retrieved January 9, 2014. 
^ Metz, Cade (January 9, 2014). "The Grand Experiment Goes Live: Overstock.com Is Now Accepting Bitcoins". Wired. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ Metz, Cade (January 10, 2014). "In First Day With Bitcoin, Overstock Does $126,000 in Sales". Wired. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ Morpheus (January 10, 2014). "Overstock.com increases daily revenue 4.3% by adding bitcoin, first day". NeoMoney.net. Retrieved March 11, 2014. 
^ Wilhelm, Alex (March 13, 2014). "Overstock's Bitcoin Purchases Account for Less Than 1% of Revenue, But It's Growing". TechCrunch. Retrieved March 13, 2014. 
^ "I'm Patrick Byrne, a pro-freedom supporter of cryptocurrency and school vouchers, early critic of Wall Street, three time cancer survivor, journalist at DeepCapture.com, and CEO and founder of Overstock.com. AMA!". Reddit. May 3, 2014. Retrieved May 5, 2014. 
^ Chavez-Dreyfuss, Gertrude (August 13, 2014). "Overstock CEO says bitcoin sales to add 4 cents to 2014 EPS". Reuters/Yahoo! News. Retrieved August 18, 2014. 
^ "Overstock to Donate 4% of Bitcoin Revenue to Foundations Advocating Cryptocurrency Adoption". Overstock Investor Portal. September 14, 2014. Retrieved February 19, 2015. 
^ Burden, Kirstie (December 27, 2007). "Overstock Reappears on the Regulation SHO Threshold List". PR Newswire. Reuters. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Antilla, Susan (February 21, 2007). "Overstock Blames with Creepy Strategy". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Nocera, Joe (June 10, 2006). "New Crusade for Master of Overstock". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Norris, Floyd (July 14, 2007). "S.E.C. Ends Decades-Old Price Limits on Short Selling". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Nocera, Joe (February 25, 2006). "Overstock's Campaign Of Menace". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "The Phantom Menace", by Bethany McLean, Fortune Magazine, Nov. 15, 2005
^ Adam Tanner (May 8, 2008). "Fiesty Overstock.com CEO sees brighter future". Reuters. Retrieved 16 October 2016. 
^ "Copper River Files Countersuit Vs Overstock, CEO, Directors", by Carol Remond, Dow Jones News Service, November 10, 2007
^ McLean, Bethany (November 28, 2007). "Overstock.com drama spurs lawsuits". Fortune. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Mitchell, Dan (January 20, 2007). "Flames Flare Over Naked Shorts". The New York Times. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Boyd, Roddy (January 2, 2007). "Overstock.com Lashes Out at Critics on the Web". New York Post. Archived from the original on February 29, 2008. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Antilla, Susan (February 11, 2007). "Overstock Blames With Creepy Strategy". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sage, Alexandria (October 13, 2008). "Overstock says settled claims against Gradient". Business & Finance. Reuters. Retrieved October 17, 2008. 
^ a b Beebe, Paul (October 13, 2008). "Overstock.com settles suit with research firm". The Salt Lake Tribune. Retrieved October 17, 2008. 
^ "Industry News-Institutional and Traditional Investment News-eVestment – Institutional Investment – Hedge Fund News – Pension Fund Media Coverage". Hedgefund.net. Retrieved February 7, 2014. 
^ "Overstock says it settles with hedge fund". Reuters. December 8, 2008. Retrieved December 9, 2009. 
^ Inc, Overstock (December 8, 2009). "Rocker Pays $5 Million to Overstock.com to Settle Lawsuit". Press Release. Retrieved December 8, 2009. 
^ "Copper River Partners Settles Lawsuit with Overstock.com, Inc.". PR Newswire. December 9, 2009. Retrieved December 9, 2009. 
^ a b King, Danny (February 3, 2007). "Overstock sues brokers". Deseret Morning News. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ Sandoval, Greg (March 28, 2007). "Overstock CEO reflects on Cramer debacle". CNET News. Archived from the original on July 10, 2012. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ King, Danny (February 24, 2007). "Overstock's Suit Spurs Board Exit". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ King, Danny (May 25, 2007). "Overstock Director Groves Resigns Because of Broker Lawsuit". Bloomberg L.P. Retrieved March 22, 2008. 
^ "Form 8-K for OVERSTOCK.COM, INC". Yahoo. Archived from the original on June 28, 2011. Retrieved November 3, 2013. 
^ [1] Archived June 29, 2011, at the Wayback Machine.


External links[edit]

Overstock.com
Five-year stock price
"Overstock.com Rezzes Into Second Life", CNN ireport.com, 2008-05-02. Retrieved on 2008-05-02.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Overstock.com&oldid=788495287#Board_of_directors"					
Categories: Companies based in UtahOnline companiesInternet properties established in 1997Online retailers of the United States1997 establishments in UtahCompanies listed on NASDAQHidden categories: CS1 maint: Uses authors parameterWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from February 2015Pages using deprecated image syntaxPages using infobox company with unsupported parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


FrançaisNederlandsРусскийSimple English 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 19:14.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 












Simon, Stormy - The Wall Street Transcript













































 





































Stormy  Simon
Stormy Simon joined Overstock.com, Inc., in 2001 and has held various marketing and management positions. She currently serves in a dual role as the Senior Vice President of both Marketing and Customer Care. Besides being responsible for all of Overstock’s Internet marketing efforts, Ms. Simon also oversees Overstock’s offline marketing efforts, writing and producing all television, radio and print advertising, handling all media buys, and she is also responsible for public relations. Ms. Simon has restructured the customer care department around cross-functional teams, set up certification and online education programs for customer care agents, implemented CRM software and announced her ambition of perfecting the customer experience.
Related Interviews:Overstock.com, Inc. - Stormy SimonSeptember 06, 2010







CartLatest NewsJames Abate of Centre Asset Management Sees Consumer Demand Driving New Stock HighsMalcolm E. Polley of Stewart Capital and How to Play the Health Care StocksTimothy Biltz, CEO of Lumos Networks Identifies the Key Component for Future 5G NetworksThe Wall Street Transcript is a completely unique resource for investors and business researchers.Over 20,000 CEO, Equity Analyst and Money Manager InterviewsSubscribe now!Sign Up For Newsletter Weekly email with New In-Depth Interviews


Email: 



Most Popular InterviewsDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundJames A. Abate Published July 20, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: AMAT JNJ COH RL COG NVDA ADBE ATVI KLAC AMZN NFLX GOOG FB GLW MU 005930 000660 WFM JWN CMG GPS EQT RICE SPLS Buy ($25)Finding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesHenry  Beukema Published July 19, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: ORCL MSFT NSRGY AMZN WFM LRLCY AGN LNR Buy ($25)Better Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap SpaceMalcolm E. Polley Published July 18, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: PRAA HURN FII FL NKE AMZN WFM WBA RAD Buy ($25)Most Popular ReportsWireless Communications & Telecom Published July 14, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published July 11, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published June 30, 2017Buy ($175) 






Top Company Interviews






Register for a Free Account to gain greater access to
            The Wall Street Transcript right now




CEO INTERVIEWSInterview with the President and CEO: Lumos Networks Corp. (NASDAQ:LMOS)Interview with the Corporate VP of Business Development, Strategy and Investor Relations: DSP Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:DSPG)Interview with the CEO and Director: Tactile Systems Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:TCMD) 

SECTOR ROUNDTABLESNatural Gas Weighs Heavy On E&P Near-Term ProspectsRoundtable Forum:optimism Despite Uncertainty In For-profit EducationRoundtable Forum:a Shift In Focus To Natural Gas From Oil 

MONEY MANAGER INTERVIEWSDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundFinding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesBetter Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap Space 

ANALYST INTERVIEWSAnalyzing the Secular Drivers Within Communications Infrastructure and TelecomSatellite Companies Benefiting from Growth in Data TrafficIncreased Focus on Content as Consumers Shift to Digital Consumption 




Subscribe Today!







                Since 1963
                © The Wall Street Transcript 1997-2016
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy  
            





https://www.twst.com/wp-admin/admin-ajax.php

Pin It on Pinterest





































Share This





Twitter





Facebook





Google+





Gmail





LinkedIn








































×





Join now for free!
Already a member?






First Name 





Last Name 





Email address *








Create new account
 


or create an account with a social network.

Join with Facebook


Join with Twitter


Join with Google








Username or Email address: *





Password: *






LoginJoin now! | Forgot password?
 


or login using a social network


Log in with Facebook


Log in with Twitter


Log in with Google












